Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0173.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the legislature, the executive, the department of the attorney general, the department of state, the department of treasury, the department of technology, management, and budget, the department of civil rights, and certain state purposes related to those branches and departments for the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: TOTAL GENERAL GOVERNMENT APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 44.0 Full-time equated classified positions 7,805.6 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,425,718,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 1,231,348,400 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 4,194,370,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 44,573,800 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 17,851,700 Total private revenues 4,770,200 Total other state restricted revenues 2,882,882,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,244,291,800 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 649.4 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 137,355,700 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 39,381,700 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 97,974,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 10,567,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 950,000 Total other state restricted revenues 22,678,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 63,778,000 (2) ATTORNEY GENERAL OPERATIONS Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 649.4 Attorney general $ 112,500 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 5.0 993,100 Child support enforcement--FTEs 26.0 4,079,100 Consumer protection relief task force--FTEs 25.0 5,000,000 Human trafficking commission support services 1,000,000 Operations--FTEs 578.4 119,429,600 Prosecuting attorneys coordinating council--FTEs 14.0 2,653,700 Public safety initiative--FTE 1.0 888,300 Sexual assault law enforcement--FTEs 5.0 1,493,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 135,650,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from EGLE 2,445,500 IDG from LEO, Michigan occupational safety and health administration 211,400 IDG from LEO, workforce development agency 100,700 IDG from MDOC 737,200 IDG from MDE 822,100 IDG from MDHHS, health policy 330,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 IDG from MDHHS, human services 6,938,300 IDG from MDHHS, medical services administration 778,100 IDG from MDHHS, WIC 373,000 IDG from MDIFS, financial and insurance services 1,613,100 IDG from MDLARA, cannabis regulatory agency 2,528,900 IDG from MDLARA, fireworks safety fund 91,100 IDG from MDLARA, health professions 3,146,300 IDG from MDLARA, licensing and regulation fees 795,000 IDG from MDLARA, remonumentation fees 118,100 IDG from MDLARA, securities fees 779,700 IDG from MDLARA, unlicensed builders 1,198,300 IDG from MDMVA 181,700 IDG from MDOS, children's protection registry 45,000 IDG from MDOT, comprehensive transportation fund 111,500 IDG from MDOT, state aeronautics fund 196,400 IDG from MDOT, state trunkline fund 2,236,500 IDG from MDSP 288,000 IDG from MDTMB 1,352,200 IDG from MDTMB, civil service commission 342,300 IDG from MDTMB, risk management revolving fund 1,410,000 IDG from Michigan state housing development authority 1,287,600 IDG from Michigan strategic fund 202,800 IDG from MILEAP 1,004,600 IDG from Treasury 7,716,200 Federal revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 DAG, state administrative match grant/food stamps 137,000 Federal funds 3,801,500 HHS, medical assistance, medigrant 419,800 HHS-OS, state Medicaid fraud control units 6,208,900 Special revenue funds: Unadjudicated property seizures 950,000 Antitrust enforcement collections 854,500 Attorney general's operations fund 1,118,600 Auto repair facilities fees 372,200 Franchise fees 429,200 Game and fish protection account 687,600 Human trafficking commission fund 170,000 Lawsuit settlement proceeds fund 2,697,600 Liquor purchase revolving fund 1,647,500 Michigan employment security act - administrative fund 2,521,000 Michigan merit award trust fund 542,400 Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund 199,500 Mobile home code fund 274,700 Prisoner reimbursement 790,600 Prosecuting attorneys training fees 455,100 Public utility assessments 2,221,700 Reinstatement fees 288,700 Retirement funds 1,169,500 Second injury fund 670,400 Self-insurers security fund 409,600 Silicosis and dust disease fund 117,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State building authority revenue 133,200 State casino gaming fund 1,987,800 State lottery fund 393,200 Utility consumer representation fund 1,962,600 Waterways account 153,600 Worker's compensation administrative revolving fund 410,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 62,072,300 (3) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 1,705,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,705,700 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 1,705,700 Sec. 103. DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL RIGHTS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 171.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 30,781,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 30,781,400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 2,899,300 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 18,700 Total other state restricted revenues 58,500 1 2 3 4 6 7 8 9 10 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 27,804,900 (2) CIVIL RIGHTS OPERATIONS Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 171.0 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 869,800 Complaint investigation and enforcement--FTEs 123.0 19,646,700 Division on deaf, deaf/blind, and hard of hearing--FTEs 6.0 761,400 Executive office--FTEs 27.0 3,757,100 Museums support 1,500,000 Public affairs--FTEs 15.0 2,697,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 29,232,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: EEOC, state and local antidiscrimination agency contracts 1,257,700 HUD, grant 1,626,600 Special revenue funds: Private revenues 18,700 State restricted indirect funds 58,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 26,271,000 (3) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 1,548,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,548,900 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 EEOC, state and local antidiscrimination agency contracts 15,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,533,900 Sec. 104. EXECUTIVE OFFICE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0 Full-time equated classified positions 86.2 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,609,200 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,609,200 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 9,609,200 (2) EXECUTIVE OFFICE OPERATIONS Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0 Full-time equated classified positions 86.2 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 8.0 $ 1,670,500 Governor 159,300 Lieutenant governor 111,600 Executive office--FTEs 86.2 7,667,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,609,200 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 9,609,200 Sec. 105. LEGISLATURE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 236,955,300 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 7,555,600 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 229,399,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 481,700 Total other state restricted revenues 8,134,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 220,783,500 (2) LEGISLATURE Senate $ 52,057,000 Senate automated data processing 3,290,000 Senate fiscal agency 4,978,400 House of representatives 76,450,500 House automated data processing 3,290,000 House fiscal agency 4,978,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 145,044,300 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 145,044,300 (3) LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL Legislative corrections ombudsman $ 1,633,400 Legislative council 16,966,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Legislative service bureau automated data processing 3,823,500 Michigan veterans facility ombudsman 379,700 National association dues 724,800 Sentencing commission 1,000,000 Tribal legislative liaison 515,000 Worker's compensation 182,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 25,225,500 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 25,225,500 (4) LEGISLATIVE RETIREMENT SYSTEM Actuarially determined contribution $ 100 General nonretirement expenses 6,468,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,468,600 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Court fees 1,505,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 4,963,400 (5) PROPERTY MANAGEMENT Binsfeld Office Building and other properties $ 10,161,000 Cora Anderson Building 7,029,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 17,190,800 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 17,190,800 (6) STATE CAPITOL HISTORIC SITE Bond/lease obligations $ 100 General operations 6,771,300 Restoration, renewal, and maintenance 4,079,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,851,300 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Private - gifts and bequests 481,700 Capitol historic site fund 4,079,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 6,289,700 (7) OFFICE OF THE AUDITOR GENERAL Unclassified positions--FTEs $ 446,500 Field operations 31,728,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 32,174,800 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG, commercial mobile radio system emergency telephone fund 46,200 IDG, contract audit administration fees 90,000 IDG, deferred compensation funds 120,000 IDG, emp ben div postemployment life insurance benefit 23,700 IDG from LEO, self-insurers security fund 99,900 IDG from MDHHS, human services 40,000 IDG from MDLARA, liquor purchase revolving fund 150,400 IDG from MDMVA, Michigan veterans facility authority 108,200 IDG from MDOT, comprehensive transportation fund 48,500 IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 393,900 IDG from MDOT, state aeronautics fund 38,100 IDG from MDOT, state trunkline fund 914,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 IDG, legislative retirement system 31,900 IDG, Michigan economic development corporation 157,400 IDG, Michigan education trust fund 82,000 IDG, Michigan finance authority 306,900 IDG, Michigan justice training commission fund 70,000 IDG, Michigan strategic fund 269,000 IDG, office of retirement services 802,200 IDG, other restricted funding sources 27,200 IDG, state sponsored group insurance fund 87,200 IDG, Pension schedules of employer allocations funds 248,000 IDG, single audit act 3,400,000 Special revenue funds: 21st century jobs trust fund 120,300 Brownfield development fund 35,200 Game and fish protection account 39,100 MDTMB, civil service commission 221,900 Michigan state housing development authority fees 141,700 Michigan veterans' trust fund 2,000 Michigan veterans' trust fund income and assessments 23,000 Motor transport revolving fund 9,200 Office services revolving fund 12,700 State disbursement unit, office of child support 71,500 State services fee fund 1,858,700 Waterways account 14,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 22,069,800 Sec. 106. DEPARTMENT OF STATE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 1,629.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 296,597,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 20,000,000 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 276,597,400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 1,460,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 50,100 Total other state restricted revenues 262,935,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 12,151,800 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 130.0 Secretary of state $ 112,500 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 5.0 828,300 Executive direction--FTEs 30.0 5,185,900 Operations--FTEs 100.0 27,192,200 Property management 11,061,800 Worker's compensation 139,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 44,519,900 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Special revenue funds: Abandoned vehicle fees 239,800 Auto repair facilities fees 125,800 Children's protection registry fund 272,300 Driver fees 2,597,000 Enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card fund 2,181,500 Parking ticket court fines 13,600 Personal identification card fees 101,900 Scrap tire fund 78,600 Transportation administration collection fund 37,843,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,066,100 (3) LEGAL SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 179.0 Operations--FTEs 179.0 $ 26,562,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 26,562,300 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Auto repair facilities fees 3,250,600 Driver education provider and instructor fund 150,000 Driver fees 1,658,500 Enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card fund 2,902,200 Reinstatement fees - operator licenses 598,500 Transportation administration collection fund 17,051,300 Vehicle theft prevention fees 748,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 202,600 (4) CUSTOMER DELIVERY SERVICES 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Full-time equated classified positions 1,240.0 Branch operations--FTEs 903.0 $ 99,863,100 Central operations--FTEs 335.0 54,816,100 Digital ID 100,000 Motorcycle safety education administration--FTEs 2.0 654,700 Motorcycle safety education grants 2,100,000 Organ donor program 129,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 157,663,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 20,000,000 Federal revenues: DOT 860,000 OHSP 600,000 Special revenue funds: Private funds 100 Thomas Daley gift of life fund 50,000 Abandoned vehicle fees 450,900 Auto repair facilities fees 763,700 Child support clearance fees 100,000 Driver fees 22,881,500 Driver improvement course fund 800,000 Enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card fund 14,090,200 Expedient service fees 2,996,700 Marine safety fund 1,579,000 Michigan state police auto theft fund 123,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Mobile home commission fees 511,200 Motorcycle safety and education awareness fund 350,000 Motorcycle safety fund 2,104,700 Off-road vehicle title fees 170,700 Parking ticket court fines 518,400 Personal identification card fees 2,399,500 Recreation passport fee revenue 500,000 Reinstatement fees - operator licenses 1,028,200 Snowmobile registration fee revenue 390,000 Transportation administration collection fund 82,521,800 Vehicle theft prevention fees 786,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,087,400 (5) ELECTION REGULATION Full-time equated classified positions 80.0 County clerk education and training fund $ 100,000 Election administration and services--FTEs 80.0 28,641,200 Fees to local units 109,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 28,851,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Election administration support fund 20,255,500 Notary education and training fund 100,000 Notary fee fund 200,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 8,295,500 (6) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 39,001,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 39,001,200 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Special revenue funds: Administrative order processing fee 11,800 Auto repair facilities fees 129,800 Driver fees 789,600 Enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card fund 679,200 Expedient service fees 803,300 Personal identification card fees 174,000 Transportation administration collection fund 34,731,600 Vehicle theft prevention fees 181,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,500,200 Sec. 107. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 3,263.5 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,851,000,900 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 1,152,596,000 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 698,404,900 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 4,393,300 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 2,360,100 Total private revenues 229,400 Total other state restricted revenues 142,450,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 548,971,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 933.0 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,134,600 Administrative services--FTEs 178.5 28,126,400 Budget and financial management--FTEs 199.0 43,621,800 Building operation services--FTEs 266.0 110,985,500 Business support services--FTEs 112.0 17,850,900 Design and construction services--FTEs 54.0 9,861,500 Executive operations--FTEs 12.0 2,473,300 Michigan center for data and analytics--FTEs 44.0 7,213,700 Motor vehicle fleet--FTEs 39.0 101,194,600 Office of the state employer--FTEs 14.0 2,211,800 Property management 11,614,600 State archives--FTEs 14.5 2,077,100 State fleet electric vehicle transition 1,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 339,365,800 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from accounting service centers user charges 6,879,800 IDG from building occupancy and parking charges 113,660,200 IDG from MDHHS, human services 757,700 IDG from MDLARA 100,000 IDG from motor transport fund 101,194,600 IDG from technology user fees 11,701,400 IDG from user fees 9,964,100 Federal revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal funds 4,393,200 Special revenue funds: Local funds 35,000 Local - MPSCS subscriber and maintenance fees 24,600 Private funds 229,300 Health management funds 438,200 Other agency charges 1,307,600 SIGMA user fees 2,621,200 Special revenue, internal service, and pension trust funds 21,507,700 State restricted indirect funds 3,633,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 60,918,200 (3) TECHNOLOGY SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 1,649.5 Enterprise user experience--FTEs 14.0 $ 5,260,500 Homeland security initiative/cyber security--FTEs 58.0 29,514,800 Information technology investment fund 35,000,000 Information technology services--FTEs 1,440.5 902,505,300 Michigan public safety communications system--FTEs 137.0 50,080,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,022,361,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from technology user fees 902,505,300 Special revenue funds: Local - MPSCS subscriber and maintenance fees 2,300,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 117,555,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (4) STATEWIDE APPROPRIATIONS Professional development fund - AFSCME $ 50,000 Professional development fund - MPE, SEIU, scientific and engineering unit 100,000 Professional development fund - MPE, SEIU, technical unit 50,000 Professional development fund - NEREs 200,000 Professional development fund - UAW 700,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,100,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from employer contributions 1,100,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (5) SPECIAL PROGRAMS Full-time equated classified positions 199.0 Capital city services $ 1,000,000 Energy efficiency revolving fund 1,750,000 Make it in Michigan 400 Office of the child advocate--FTEs 22.0 3,878,000 Property management executive/legislative 1,519,600 Retirement services--FTEs 177.0 30,340,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 38,488,900 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 100 Special revenue funds: Local funds 100 Private funds 100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Deferred compensation 5,246,600 Make it in Michigan competitiveness fund 100 Pension trust funds 25,001,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 8,240,600 Payments to locals 1,000,000 (6) STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY RENT State building authority rent - community colleges $ 38,032,600 State building authority rent - state agencies 81,465,200 State building authority rent - universities 142,153,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 261,651,700 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 261,651,700 (7) CIVIL SERVICE COMMISSION Full-time equated classified positions 482.0 Agency services--FTEs 113.0 $ 18,243,700 Employee benefits--FTEs 29.0 6,673,000 Executive direction--FTEs 38.0 9,911,500 Human resources operations--FTEs 302.0 40,903,600 Information technology services and projects 12,199,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 87,931,400 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: State restricted funds 1% 34,964,200 State restricted indirect funds 14,669,800 State sponsored group insurance 10,073,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 28,223,800 (8) CAPITAL OUTLAY 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Enterprisewide special maintenance for state facilities $ 28,000,000 Major special maintenance, remodeling, and addition for state agencies 3,800,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 31,800,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from building occupancy charges 3,800,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 28,000,000 (9) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 52,816,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 52,816,100 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from building occupancy and parking charges 723,200 IDG from user fees 209,700 Special revenue funds: Deferred compensation 2,600 Pension trust funds 15,219,600 SIGMA user fees 2,974,800 Special revenue, internal service, and pension trust funds 2,706,500 State restricted indirect funds 2,083,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 28,895,800 (10) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Information technology investment fund $ 15,486,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 15,486,000 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 State general fund/general purpose $ 15,486,000 Sec. 108. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0 Full-time equated classified positions 2,006.5 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,863,418,500 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 11,815,100 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,851,603,400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 25,254,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 15,491,600 Total private revenues 3,040,300 Total other state restricted revenues 2,446,624,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 361,193,000 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0 Full-time equated classified positions 466.5 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 10.0 $ 1,311,100 Bureau of accounting and financial services--FTEs 75.0 9,803,900 Bureau of operational excellence--FTEs 25.0 4,056,900 Collections services bureau--FTEs 190.0 29,067,700 Department services--FTEs 64.0 7,697,000 Executive direction and operations--FTEs 60.5 8,715,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Office of security and data risk management--FTEs 20.0 3,215,300 Property management 8,044,600 Unclaimed property--FTEs 32.0 5,738,100 Worker's compensation 44,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 77,694,100 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG, data/collection services fees 483,500 IDG, accounting service center user charges 417,500 IDG, MDHHS, title IV-D 838,600 IDG, levy/warrant cost assessment fees 3,750,400 IDG, state agency collection fees 2,054,500 Federal revenues: DED-OPSE, federal lenders allowance 511,600 DED-OPSE, higher education act of 1995 insured loans 548,400 Special revenue funds: Delinquent tax collection revenue 41,880,500 Escheats revenue 5,738,100 Garnishment fees 2,876,200 Justice system fund 458,800 Marihuana regulation fund 1,291,800 Marihuana regulatory fund 193,900 MFA, bond and loan program revenue 677,800 State lottery fund 330,300 State restricted indirect funds 288,900 State services fee fund 376,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Treasury fees 47,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 14,809,700 (3) LOCAL GOVERNMENT PROGRAMS Full-time equated classified positions 108.0 Flint settlement payment $ 35,000,000 Liability reimbursement 100 Local finance--FTEs 18.0 2,993,400 Michigan infrastructure council--FTEs 5.0 3,866,000 Property tax assessor training--FTE 1.0 1,111,600 Supervision of the general property tax law--FTEs 84.0 18,586,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 61,557,900 Appropriated from: IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 254,700 Special revenue funds: Local - assessor training fees 1,111,600 Local - audit charges 623,500 Local - equalization study chargeback 40,000 Local - revenue from local government 100,000 Delinquent tax collection revenue 1,667,600 Land reutilization fund 2,073,800 Municipal finance fees 999,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 54,687,600 (4) TAX PROGRAMS Full-time equated classified positions 766.0 Bottle act implementation $ 250,000 Caregiver tax credit 30,000,000 Home heating assistance 3,131,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Insurance provider assessment program--FTEs 10.0 2,242,600 Living donor tax credit 750,000 Office of revenue and tax analysis--FTEs 25.0 4,881,200 Tax and economic policy--FTEs 73.0 14,097,800 Tax compliance--FTEs 314.0 47,473,900 Tax processing--FTEs 333.0 42,936,200 Tobacco tax enforcement--FTEs 11.0 1,632,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 147,395,900 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 2,894,100 IDG from MDOT, state aeronautics fund 72,200 Federal revenues: HHS-SSA, low-income energy assistance 3,131,400 Special revenue funds: Bottle deposit fund 250,000 Brownfield redevelopment fund 213,800 Delinquent tax collection revenue 76,842,500 Insurance provider fund 2,242,600 Marihuana regulation fund 2,665,700 Marihuana regulatory fund 119,300 Michigan state waterways fund 107,100 Qualified heavy equipment rental personal property exemption reimbursement fund 422,900 Tobacco tax revenue 4,277,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 54,157,000 (5) FINANCIAL PROGRAMS Full-time equated classified positions 140.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Investments--FTEs 81.0 $ 22,858,500 MiABLE administrative fee assistance 347,500 State and authority finance--FTEs 20.0 4,779,500 Student financial assistance programs--FTEs 39.0 20,472,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 48,457,900 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG, fiscal agent service fees 215,200 Federal revenues: DED-OPSE, federal lenders allowance 3,429,300 DED-OPSE, higher education act of 1995 insured loans 17,043,100 Special revenue funds: Defined contribution administrative fee revenue 300,000 Michigan finance authority bond and loan program revenue 2,848,900 Retirement funds 17,904,100 School bond fees 938,500 Treasury fees 4,883,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 894,900 (6) DEBT SERVICE Clean Michigan initiative $ 24,203,000 Great Lakes water quality bond 67,560,000 Quality of life bond 3,118,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 94,881,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 94,881,000 (7) GRANTS 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Community aid for responders and emergency services $ 70,800,000 Convention facility development distribution 128,730,700 Election administrative support fund 20,255,500 Emergency 911 payments 49,118,600 Health and safety fund grants 1,220,900 Qualified heavy equipment rental personal property exemption reimbursement distribution 4,500,000 Recreational marihuana grants 105,600,000 Senior citizen cooperative housing tax exemption program 11,512,400 Wrongful imprisonment compensation fund 10,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 401,738,100 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Community infrastructure fund 50,000,000 Convention facility development fund 128,730,700 Emergency 911 fund 49,118,600 Health and safety fund 1,220,900 Marihuana regulation fund 105,600,000 Qualified heavy equipment rental personal property exemption reimbursement fund 4,500,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 62,567,900 (8) BUREAU OF STATE LOTTERY Full-time equated classified positions 216.0 Lottery information technology services and projects $ 3,857,800 Lottery operations--FTEs 216.0 34,271,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 38,129,300 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: State lottery fund 38,129,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (9) MICHIGAN GAMING CONTROL BOARD Full-time equated classified positions 229.0 Casino gaming control operations--FTEs 199.0 $ 42,660,500 Gaming information technology services and projects 5,370,000 Horse racing--FTEs 10.0 2,160,100 Michigan gaming control board 113,600 Millionaire party regulation--FTEs 20.0 3,258,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 53,562,700 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Casino gambling agreements 1,025,300 Equine development fund 2,280,900 Fantasy contest fund 1,082,600 Internet gaming fund 16,007,900 Internet sports betting fund 3,011,600 State services fee fund 30,154,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (10) PAYMENTS IN LIEU OF TAXES Commercial forest reserve $ 3,603,900 Purchased lands 12,910,600 Swamp and tax reverted lands 21,798,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 38,312,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Private funds 40,300 Game and fish protection account 4,374,900 Michigan natural resources trust fund 3,289,700 Michigan state waterways fund 379,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 30,227,900 (11) REVENUE SHARING City, village, and township revenue sharing $ 366,902,100 Constitutional state general revenue sharing grants 1,099,028,400 County revenue sharing 320,222,600 Financially distressed cities, villages, or townships 2,500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,788,653,100 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Community infrastructure fund 62,466,000 Sales tax 1,726,187,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (12) STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY Full-time equated classified positions 4.0 State building authority--FTEs 4.0 $ 1,026,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,026,200 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: State building authority revenue 1,026,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (13) CITY INCOME TAX ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM Full-time equated classified positions 77.0 City income tax administration program--FTEs 77.0 $ 11,222,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 11,222,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Local - city income tax fund 11,222,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (14) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Treasury operations information technology services and projects $ 50,587,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 50,587,800 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 834,400 Federal revenues: DED-OPSE, federal lenders allowance 590,200 Special revenue funds: Local - city income tax fund 2,274,500 Delinquent tax collection revenue 18,379,600 Marihuana regulation fund 778,200 Retirement funds 829,700 Tobacco tax revenue 134,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 26,767,000 (15) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Community aid for responders and emergency services $ 47,200,000 MI financial empowerment 3,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 50,200,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Private funds 3,000,000 Community infrastructure fund 25,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 22,200,000 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2024-2025 general sections Sec. 201. (1) In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $3,949,756,000.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $2,299,864,100.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF STATE Election administration and services $ 10,000,000 Fees to local units 500 Motorcycle safety education grants 1,715,400 Subtotal $ 11,715,900 DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET Capital city services $ 1,000,000 Subtotal $ 1,000,000 DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Airport parking distribution pursuant to section 909 $ 46,000,000 City, village, and township revenue sharing 366,902,100 Commercial forest reserve 3,603,900 Community aid for responders and emergency services 118,000,000 Constitutional state general revenue sharing grants 1,099,028,400 Convention facility development fund distribution 128,730,700 County revenue sharing 320,222,600 Emergency 9-1-1 payments 49,118,600 Financially distressed cities, villages, or townships 2,500,000 Health and safety fund grants 1,220,900 Recreational marihuana grants 105,600,000 Purchased lands 12,910,600 Senior citizen cooperative housing tax exemption program 11,512,400 Swamp and tax reverted lands 21,798,000 Subtotal $ 2,287,148,200 TOTAL $ 2,299,864,100 (2) In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, in the appropriations acts for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending from state sources is estimated at $48,106,717,200.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is estimated at $25,390,911,000.00. The proportion of total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units is estimated 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 at 52.78%. (3) If payments to local units of government and state spending from state sources for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 are different than the amounts estimated in subsection (2), the state budget director shall report the payments to local units of government and state spending from state sources that were made for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations not later than 30 days after the final book-closing for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "COBRA" means the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1985, Public Law 99-272. (b) "DAG" means the United States Department of Agriculture. (c) "DED" means the United States Department of Education. (d) "DED-OPSE" means the DED Office of Postsecondary Education. (e) "DOL" means the United States Department of Labor. (f) "EEOC" means the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission. (g) "FTE" means full-time equated. (h) "Geographically disadvantaged business enterprise" means a geographically-disadvantaged business enterprise as that term is defined by Executive Directive No. 2023-1. (i) "GF/GP" means general fund/general purpose. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (j) "HHS" means the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (k) "HHS-OS" means the HHS Office of the Secretary. (l) "HHS-SSA" means the Social Security Administration. (m) "HUD" means the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. (n) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (o) "JCOS" means the joint capital outlay subcommittee. (p) "MCL" means the Michigan Compiled Laws. (q) "MDE" means the Michigan department of education. (r) "MDHHS" means the Michigan department of health and human services. (s) "MDIFS" means the Michigan department of insurance and financial services. (t) "MDLARA" means the Michigan department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (u) "MDLEO" means the Michigan department of labor and economic opportunity. (v) "MDMVA" means the Michigan department of military and veterans affairs. (w) "MDOC" means the Michigan department of corrections. (x) "MDOS" means the Michigan department of state. (y) "MDOT" means the Michigan department of transportation. (z) "MDSP" means the Michigan department of state police. (aa) "MDTMB" means the Michigan department of technology, management, and budget. (bb) "MEDC" means the Michigan economic development corporation, which is the public body corporate created under section 28 of article VII of the state constitution of 1963 and the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 urban cooperation act of 1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to 124.512, by contractual interlocal agreement effective April 5, 1999, between local participating economic development corporations formed under the economic development corporations act, 1974 PA 338, MCL 125.1601 to 125.1636, and the Michigan strategic fund. (cc) "MEGA" means the Michigan economic growth authority. (dd) "MFA" means the Michigan finance authority. (ee) "MPE" means the Michigan public employees. (ff) "MPSCS" means the Michigan public safety communications system. (gg) "MSF" means the Michigan strategic fund. (hh) "NERE" means nonexclusively represented employees. (ii) "PA" means public act. (jj) "RFP" means a request for a proposal. (kk) "SEIU" means Service Employees International Union. (ll) "SIGMA" means statewide integrated governmental management applications. (mm) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on general government, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. (nn) "WIC" means women, infants, and children. Sec. 204. A department or agency shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part. This requirement includes transmitting reports to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email and posting the reports on an internet site. Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (d) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured in facilities that employ union members. Sec. 206. A department or agency shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of a department or an agency within a department for communicating with a member of the legislature or legislative staff, unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department or agency is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, each department and agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall prepare a report on out‐of‐state travel expenses not later than January 1. The report must list all travel by classified and unclassified employees outside this state in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's or agency's budget. The department or agency shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and to the house of representatives and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 senate appropriations committees. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related expenses of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, and other revenues. Sec. 208. A principal executive department, state agency, or authority shall not use funds appropriated in part 1 to hire a person to provide legal services that are the responsibility of the attorney general. This section does not apply to legal services for bonding activities or to outside legal services that the attorney general authorizes. Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides for estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state budget office shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and the chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees. Sec. 210. (1) In accordance with section 352 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1352, which provides for a transfer of state general fund revenue into or out of the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund, the calculations required by section 352 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1352, are determined as follows: 2024 2025 2026 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Michigan personal income (millions) $643,791 $667,612 $694,316 less: transfer payments 138,700 144,200 149,400 Subtotal $505,091 $523,412 $544,916 Divided by: Detroit Consumer Price Index for 12 months ending December 31 2.932 3.001 3.095 Equals: real adjusted Michigan personal income $172,265 $174,401 $176,052 Percentage change N/A 1.2% 1.0% Growth rate in excess of 2% N/A 0.0% 0.0% Equals: calculated transfer to countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 (millions) N/A $0.0 Growth rate less than 0% N/A NO Appropriation from countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund allowed for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 N/A NO (2) Notwithstanding subsection (1), there is appropriated to the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from general fund/general purpose $50,000,000.00 of the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 general fund/general purpose unassigned fund balance recorded as part of the state book-closing process for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025. Sec. 211. A department or agency shall cooperate with the MDTMB to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for each department or agency: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (d) The number of active employees by job classification. (e) Job specifications and wage rates. Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, a department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and the chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees. Sec. 214. To the extent permissible under the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of each department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically disadvantaged business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide services or supplies, or both. Each director shall strongly encourage firms with which the department or agency contracts to subcontract with certified geographically disadvantaged business enterprises for services, supplies, or both. Sec. 215. On a quarterly basis, a department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 and the office of the auditor general shall report on the number of FTEs in pay status by type of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 staff and civil service classification, including comparison by line item of the number of FTEs authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of FTE positions employed by the department or agency or the office of the auditor general at the end of the reporting period. The report must be submitted to the senate and house appropriations committees and to the standard report recipients. Sec. 217. (1) Within 10 days after the effective date of this act, each department must provide a report to the standard report recipients containing the following information: (a) A list of any sections in this act that the department determines to be unenforceable, with a detailed legal rationale for those determinations, as applicable. (b) If a determination under subdivision (a) would affect the operations of a program or programs within the department, the department must report the estimated difference in cost between the policy outlined in the section determined to be unenforceable and the policy the department intends to pursue. (2) The department may coordinate with the executive office of the governor or other state departments or agencies to compile a statewide report for any departments or agencies required to submit a report substantially similar to the report described under subsection (1). Sec. 218. A department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. A department or agency shall follow federal and state guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. A department or agency may electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 guidelines. Sec. 219. Not later than April 1, a department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a PA affecting the department or agency that took effect during the previous calendar year. The department or agency shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 220. Each department must provide a quarterly report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following: (a) Affect the operations of the department. (b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the department. (c) Affect regulations that currently protect the public to the extent that the regulations affect an industry, community, population, or other group regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the department. (d) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the public. Sec. 221. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government resources, programs, or facilities. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or interfere with the duties of a local health officer. Sec. 222. To the extent possible, a department or agency shall 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 223. (1) General fund appropriations in part 1 shall not be expended for items in cases where federal funding or private grant funding is available for the same expenditures. (2) If a department is required to make a reduction in expenditures under section 395(1) or (2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 451, MCL 18.1395, for any appropriation under this part or part 1, the department must notify the standard report recipients not later than 10 days after the reduction. The notification must include, but not be limited to, the following: (a) A description of the fund source that is insufficient to support the expenditures being reduced and the amount of the reduction. (b) A description of the cause for the reduction, if any such cause is known. (c) A description of the functions of state government or services to residents that will be affected by the reduction. Sec. 224. Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used by this state or a department, agency, or authority of this state to purchase an ownership interest in a casino enterprise or a gambling operation as those terms are defined in the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226. Sec. 226. (1) For any grant program or project funded in part 1 intended for a single recipient organization or unit of local government, the grant program or project is for a public purpose and the department shall follow procurement statutes of this state, including any bidding requirements, unless the department can fully 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 validate, through information detailed in this part or public supporting documents, both of the following: (a) The specific organization or unit of local government that will receive or administer the funds. (b) How the funds will be administered and expended. (2) To be eligible to receive a grant described in subsection (1), both of the following must occur: (a) A recipient must submit the application under subsection (3) not later than 60 days after the effective date of this act. (b) A recipient must be 1 of the following: (i) A unit of local government, as that term is defined in section 115 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 451, MCL 18.1115. (ii) An institution of higher education. (iii) A state agency, as that term is defined in section 115 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 451, MCL 18.1115. (iv) An entity registered with the department of licensing and regulatory affairs or the department of attorney general that has been in existence for at least the 12 months preceding the effective date of this act. (v) Another entity that can demonstrate, through state or federal tax filings or other state or federal government records, that it has been in existence for at least the 12 months preceding the effective date of this act. (3) Notwithstanding any other conditions or requirements for direct appropriation grants, the department shall work with the state budget office to perform at least all of the following activities to administer the grants described in subsection (1): (a) Develop a standard application process using the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 electronic submission portal developed by the state budget office, grantee reporting requirements, and any other necessary documentation, including sponsorship information as specified under subsection (4). If the electronic submission portal identified in this subdivision is not fully functional by 60 days after the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall ensure that the standard application process and form are available promptly and paper submission is acceptable. The state budget office shall promptly submit application material received to the department for departmental review. (b) Establish a process to review, complete, and execute a grant agreement with a grant recipient. The department shall not execute a grant agreement unless all necessary documentation has been submitted and reviewed. (c) Verify to the extent possible that a grant recipient will use funds for a public purpose that serves the economic prosperity, health, safety, or general welfare of the residents of this state. (d) Review and verify all necessary information to ensure the grant recipient is reasonably able to execute the grant agreement, perform its fiduciary duty, and comply with all applicable state and federal statutes. The department may deduct the cost of background checks and any other efforts performed as part of this verification from the amount of the designated grant award. (e) Establish a standard timeline to review all documents submitted by grant recipients and provide a response within 45 business days stating whether submitted documents by a grant recipient are sufficient or in need of additional information. If additional information is needed, the 60-day deadline in subsection (2) is considered to have been met if a sponsor has been identified 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for that grant. If a grant recipient does not provide information sufficient to execute a grant agreement not later than 60 days after being notified by the department of grant approval, the department shall return funds associated with the grant to the state treasury. (f) Make an initial disbursement of up to 50% of the grant to the grant recipient not later than 60 days after a grant agreement has been executed. Disbursements must be consistent with part II, chapter 10, section 200 of the Financial Management Guide. (g) Disburse the funds remaining after the initial disbursement under subdivision (f) per the grant disbursement schedule in the executed grant agreement on a reimbursement basis after the grantee has provided sufficient documentation, as determined by the department, to verify that expenditures were made in accordance with the project purpose. (4) The identification and process for sponsorship of a grant described in subsection (1) is as follows: (a) Not later than the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall provide an initial list of grants that require legislative sponsorship to the legislature and shall make public an initial list of grants that likely will be sponsored by the department or by the state budget office. (b) A sponsor of a grant described in subsection (1) must be a legislator, the department, or the state budget office. (c) A legislative sponsor must be identified through a letter submitted by that legislator's office to the department and state budget director containing the name of the grant recipient, the intended amount of the grant, a certification from that legislator that the grant is for a public purpose, and specific citation of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the section and subsection of the public act that authorizes the grant, as applicable. (d) Within 10 business days after the effective date of this act, the senate and house of representatives shall compile an initial list of legislative grant sponsors for their respective chambers and submit those compiled lists to the state budget office and the department, and the state budget office shall identify department- or state budget office-sponsored grants. The state budget director may grant an extension of this deadline of not more than 30 days on a case-by-case basis. The state budget office shall make the compiled lists public within 14 business days after the effective date of this act. (e) Not later than 60 days after the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall publish a final list of grants requiring sponsorship. If a legislative sponsor is not identified within 60 days after the effective date of this act, the department shall do 1 of the following: (i) Identify the department or the state budget office as the sponsor. (ii) Decline to execute the grant agreement and lapse the associated funds at the end of the fiscal year. (f) At any point during the fiscal year, legislative grant sponsors may be added to a grant request. (5) An executed grant agreement under this section between the department and a grant recipient must include at least all of the following: (a) All necessary identifying information for the grant recipient, including any tax and financial information for the department to administer funds under this section. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) A description of the project for which the grant funds will be expended, including tentative timelines and the estimated budget. The department shall not reimburse expenditures that are outside of the project purpose, as stated in the executed grant agreement, from appropriations in part 1. The grantee shall return to the treasury any interest in excess of $1,000.00 earned on the grant funds while unexpended and in possession of the grantee. (c) Unless otherwise specified in department policy, a requirement that funds appropriated for the grants described in subsection (1) may be used only for expenditures that occur on or after the effective date of this act. (d) A requirement for reporting by the grant recipient to the department and the legislative sponsor that provides the status of the project and an accounting of all funds expended by the grant recipient, as determined by the department. (e) A claw-back provision that allows the department of treasury to recoup or otherwise collect any funds that are declined, unspent, or otherwise misused. (f) The signed legislative sponsorship letter required under subsection (4), incorporated into the grant agreement and included as an appendix or attachment. (g) If a grant recipient has provided information sufficient to execute a grant agreement, the state budget office shall promptly transmit that information to the department for the department's review of the grant application. If a grant recipient has provided information sufficient to execute a grant agreement within 60 days after the effective date of this act, but the grant application needs technical fixes or additional legislative action, as identified by the state budget office, the 60-day deadline in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 this subdivision is considered to have been met, if a sponsor has been identified for that grant. If a grant recipient does not provide information sufficient to execute a grant agreement not later than 60 days after being notified by the department of grant approval, the department shall return funds associated with the grant to the state treasury. (6) If appropriate to improve the administration or oversight of a grant described in subsection (1), the department may adopt a memorandum of understanding with another state department to perform the required duties under this section. (7) A grant recipient shall respond to all reasonable information requests from the department related to grant expenditures and retain grant records for not less than 7 years, and the grant may be subject to monitoring, site visits, and audits as determined by the department. The grant agreement required under this section must include signed assurance by the chief executive officer or other executive officer of the grant recipient that the requirements of this subsection will be met. (8) The grant recipient shall expend all funds awarded and complete all projects not later than September 30, 2030. If at that time any unexpended funds remain, the grant recipient shall return those funds to the state treasury. (9) Any funds that are granted to a state department are appropriated in that department for the purpose of the intended grant. (10) The state budget director may, on a case-by-case basis, extend the deadline in subsection (8) on request by a grant recipient if a sponsor has been identified for the grant. The state budget director shall notify the chairs of the senate and house of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 representatives appropriations committees not later than 5 days after an extension is granted. (11) By March 1 of the current fiscal year, the state budget office shall post a report in a publicly accessible location on its website. The report must list the grant recipient, project purpose, and location of the project for each grant described in subsection (1), the status of funds allocated and disbursed under the grant agreement, and the legislative sponsor, if applicable. After March 1, the state budget office shall update the report monthly and shall post the updated report each month. ?The state budget office shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the office has available at the time of posting for grants awarded. The state budget office may compile the information required in this report across all departments. The department shall assist the state budget office with the compilation of the report required under this subsection. (12) On request, beginning 75 days after the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall release information received for grant applications. (13) As applicable, the legislative sponsor of a grant described in subsection (1) shall not sponsor a grant, or ask another legislator to sponsor a grant, if there is a conflict of interest related to the grant recipient. (14) If the department reasonably determines that the funds allocated for an executed grant agreement under this section were misused or that use of the funds was misrepresented by the grant recipient, the department shall not award any additional funds under the executed grant agreement and shall refer the grant for review following internal audit protocols. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 227. A department or agency required to submit a report under this part shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report on the department's or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date required for each report. In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department or agency's website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years. Sec. 228. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. A department or agency receiving an appropriation under this part or part 1 must notify the standard report recipients if an appropriation of funds described under this section is projected to lapse. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL Sec. 301. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $750,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $750,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 302. (1) The attorney general shall perform all legal services, including representation before courts and administrative agencies, rendering legal opinions, and providing legal advice to a principal executive department or state agency. A principal executive department or state agency shall not employ or enter into a contract with any other person for services described in this section. (2) The attorney general shall defend judges of all state courts if a claim is made or a civil action is commenced for injuries to persons or property caused by the judge through the performance of the judge's duties while acting within the scope of the judge's authority as a judge. (3) The attorney general shall perform the duties specified in 1846 RS 12, MCL 14.28 to 14.35, and 1919 PA 232, MCL 14.101 to 14.102, and as otherwise provided by law. Sec. 303. The attorney general may provide not more than 350 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 copies of the report required under section 30 of 1846 RS 12, MCL 14.30, on a gratis basis. If the attorney general provides 350 copies of the report on a gratis basis, the attorney general may sell additional copies of the report. The attorney general shall not provide gratis copies of the report to members of the legislature. Electronic copies of biennial reports must be made available on the department of attorney general's website. The attorney general shall sell copies of the report at not less than the actual cost of the report and deposit the money received from the sales into the general fund. Sec. 304. The department of attorney general is responsible for the legal representation of the law of this state and the legal representation for state of Michigan state employee worker's disability compensation cases. The risk management revolving fund revenue appropriation in part 1 must be satisfied by billings from the department of attorney general for the actual costs of legal representation, including salaries and support costs. Sec. 307. (1) In addition to the antitrust enforcement collections revenues in part 1, not more than $350,000.00 in antitrust revenues, securities fraud revenues, consumer protection or class action enforcement revenues, or attorney fees recovered by the department of attorney general are appropriated to the department of attorney general for antitrust, securities fraud, and consumer protection or class action enforcement cases. (2) Not more than $1,000,000.00 of the unexpended funds from antitrust revenues, securities fraud revenues, or consumer protection or class action enforcement revenues at the end of the fiscal year, including antitrust funds in part 1, may be carried forward for expenditure in the following fiscal year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) On request, the department of attorney general shall make available information detailing the amount of revenue described in subsection (1) recovered by the attorney general and a description of the source of the revenue and the carryforward amount. Sec. 308. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, not more than $1,000,000.00 is appropriated from litigation expense reimbursements awarded to this state. (2) The funds described in subsection (1) may be expended for the payment of court judgments, settlements, arbitration awards or other administrative and litigation decisions, attorney fees, and litigation costs, assessed against the office of the governor, the department of attorney general, the governor, or the attorney general when acting in an official capacity as the named party in litigation against this state. The funds described in subsection (1) may also be expended for the payment of state costs incurred under section 16 of chapter X of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 770.16. (3) Unexpended funds at the end of the fiscal year may be carried forward for expenditure in the following year, but not more than a maximum authorization of $250,000.00. Sec. 309. (1) From the prisoner reimbursement funds appropriated in part 1, the department of attorney general may expend not more than $790,600.00 on activities related to the state correctional facility reimbursement act, 1935 PA 253, MCL 800.401 to 800.406. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, if the department of attorney general collects more than $1,131,000.00 in gross annual prisoner reimbursement receipts provided to the general fund, not more than $1,000,000.00 of the excess is appropriated to the department of attorney general and may be spent 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 on the representation of the MDOC and its officers, employees, and agents, including, but not limited to, the defense of litigation in civil actions filed by prisoners against this state, its departments, officers, employees, or agents. (2) Not later than March 1, the department of attorney general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the house of representatives and senate appropriations subcommittees with jurisdiction over the budget of the MDOC. The report must include all of the following: (a) The total amount of reimbursements received under section 6 of the state correctional facility reimbursement act, 1935 PA 253, MCL 800.406. (b) A description of each expenditure made from the reimbursements. (c) The amount paid to conduct the investigations from the reimbursements. (d) The amount credited to the general fund from the reimbursements. Sec. 310. (1) For the purposes of providing title IV-D child support enforcement funding, the attorney general shall maintain a cooperative agreement with the MDHHS, as the state IV-D agency, for federal IV-D funding to support the child support enforcement activities within the department of attorney general. (2) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee shall, to the extent allowed under federal law, have access to any information used by this state to locate parents who fail to pay court-ordered child support. Sec. 311. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for operations, the department of attorney general shall distribute 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 $500,000.00 to the Center for Civil Justice. The Center for Civil Justice shall use the money to do both of the following: (a) Provide legal and technical assistance to low-income individuals. (b) Pursue impact litigation that protects low-income and marginalized populations. Sec. 312. The department of attorney general shall not receive or expend funds, other than those authorized in part 1, for legal services provided specifically to other state departments or agencies except for expert witness costs, court costs, or other nonsalary litigation costs associated with a pending legal action. Sec. 313. The department of attorney general shall submit a quarterly report on the lawsuit settlement proceeds fund described in section 33 of 1846 RS 12, MCL 14.33, to the standard report recipients. Each report must include all of the following: (a) The total amount of revenue deposited in the lawsuit settlement proceeds fund in the current fiscal year delineated by case. (b) The total amount appropriated from the lawsuit settlement proceeds fund in the current fiscal year delineated by appropriation. (c) Earned settlement proceeds that are anticipated but not yet deposited in the fund delineated by case. (d) Any known potential settlement amounts from cases that have not been decided, delineated by case. Sec. 314. The department of attorney general may spend not more than $2,697,100.00 of the funds appropriated in part 1 from the lawsuit settlement proceeds fund for the payment of 1 or more of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) Court judgements, orders, settlements, arbitration awards or other administrative decisions. (b) Attorney fees, litigation costs, or investigation costs incurred by the office of the governor, the department of attorney general, the governor, the attorney general, a department, an agency, or a principal officer of a department, when acting in an official capacity. Sec. 316. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for sexual assault law enforcement efforts, the department of attorney general shall use the funds to test backlogged sexual assault kits across this state. The funding provided in part 1 must be used for only 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) To eliminate all county sexual assault kit backlogs across this state. (b) To assist local prosecutors with investigations and prosecutions of viable sexual assault cases. (c) To provide victim services. (2) Not later than February 1, the department of attorney general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The number of sexual assault kits across this state that remain untested as of January 31, 2025. (b) A detailed work plan that outlines the department of attorney general's action plan to eliminate all outstanding sexual assault kits and the time frame for completion of testing of all untested sexual assault kits. (c) A detailed work and spending plan that outlines anticipated litigation action and expenditures resulting from findings of the sexual assault kit testing. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) Any funds remaining after the department of attorney general has met the obligations required under subsection (1) may be used for the purpose of retesting any previously tested sexual assault kits across this state using currently available DNA testing. Funds may be used under this subsection only for DNA testing on previously tested kits that were not tested for DNA. If there are remaining untested sexual assault kits on January 31, 2025, funds appropriated in part 1 must be used only for the testing of those kits. Sec. 317. (1) The department of attorney general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the state budget director. The report must include all legal costs and associated expenses related to the declaration of emergency due to drinking water contamination and the investigations and any resulting prosecutions. The state budget director shall include the report in the Flint water emergency-financial and activities tracking and reporting document that is posted by the state budget director on the public website, https://www.michigan.gov/budget/fiscal-pages/reports/flint. The tracking and reporting documents must include the budget line item source for each expenditure. (2) At the conclusion of all attorney general investigations related to the declaration of emergency due to drinking water contamination, all materials related to any investigations shall be preserved pursuant to applicable document retention policies. Sec. 319. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the attorney general shall submit a quarterly report on the wrongful imprisonment compensation fund that includes at least all of the following: (a) All payments made from the wrongful imprisonment 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 compensation fund in each prior quarter of the fiscal year, and the total of those payments, including if each payment is part of a new settlement or part of an installment plan. (b) Total payments made from each prior fiscal year and the total of all payments to date. (c) Any settlements that have been decided but have yet to receive a payment. (d) The number of known cases seeking a settlement, but do not have a final judgment, and the dollar amount of each potential payment for these known cases, and the total of these payments. (e) The balance of the wrongful imprisonment compensation fund at the end of the previous quarter. (f) The percentage of claims received in the immediately preceding fiscal quarter that were awarded compensation. (g) The percentage of claims received in the immediately preceding fiscal year that were awarded compensation. (h) For claims that did not receive the full amount of compensation sought, both of the following: (i) The amount of compensation that was sought. (ii) The amount of compensation that was received. Sec. 320. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of attorney general shall do all of the following: (a) Not later than 14 days after the settlement of a lawsuit with a fiscal impact of $200,000.00 or more, submit a report on the settlement to the standard report recipients. (b) Enforce the laws of this state. (2) Any proceeds from a lawsuit initiated by or settlement agreement entered into on behalf of this state against a manufacturer of tobacco products or manufacturer or distributor of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 opioid products by the attorney general are state funds, unless otherwise directed by a court or legal agreement, and are subject to appropriation as provided by law. Sec. 321. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of attorney general shall maintain a publicly accessible website dedicated to opioid settlement distributions. The website must include estimated future amounts payable to local units of government and estimated amounts received by local units of government, delineated by case settlement agreement. Sec. 322. (1) Not later than February 1, the department of attorney general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the cumulative dollar expenditure amount related to each of the following initiatives and activities of the department of attorney general for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) Catholic church investigation. (b) Elder abuse task force. (c) Conviction integrity unit. (d) Opioid litigation. (e) Hate crimes unit and domestic terrorism unit. (f) Payroll fraud enforcement unit. (g) PFAS contamination. As used in this subdivision, "PFAS" means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. (h) Human trafficking. (i) Robocall enforcement. (j) Job court. (k) Organized retail crime unit. (l) Reducing utility rate increases. (m) Boy Scouts of America investigation. (n) Address confidentiality program. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) For each expenditure required to be reported under subsection (1), the report must include the dollar amount spent by fund source. Sec. 324. (1) Not later than September 30, the department of attorney general must make available to the public on its website a report on the activities and findings, since April 1, 2019, of the payroll fraud enforcement unit. The report must include all of the following: (a) A list of each complaint received by the unit. (b) For each complaint listed under subdivision (a), whether the attorney general took enforcement action on the complaint and, if applicable, a description of the enforcement action. (2) If the payroll fraud enforcement unit requests that another department or agency investigate the validity of a report received by the unit, or if the unit refers a complaint to another department or agency, the department of attorney general shall request the department or agency to report back on the department's or agency's findings to enable the department of attorney general to comply with this section. Sec. 325. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for consumer protection relief task force, the department of attorney general shall create and maintain a task force within the corporate oversight division dedicated to consumer protection, price gouging enforcement, and regulatory enforcement of existing laws and rules. Sec. 326. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for human trafficking commission support services, the department of attorney general shall provide victim services on behalf of the Michigan human trafficking commission. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL RIGHTS Sec. 401. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $375,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 402. (1) In addition to the appropriations contained in part 1, the department of civil rights may receive and expend not more than $600,000.00 in funds from local sources, private sources, or both, for all of the following purposes: (a) Developing and presenting training for employers on equal employment opportunity law and procedures. (b) Publishing and selling civil rights related informational material. (c) Providing copies of material made available in response to requests under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (d) Paying other copy fees, subpoena fees, and witness fees. (e) Developing, presenting, and participating in mediation processes for certain civil rights cases. (f) Providing workshops, seminars, and recognition or award programs consistent with the programmatic mission of the individual 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 unit sponsoring or coordinating the programs. (g) Paying staffing costs for all activities included in this subsection. (2) Not later than November 30, the department of civil rights shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations on the amount of funds received and expended for purposes authorized under this section. Sec. 403. (1) The department of civil rights may contract with local units of government to review equal employment opportunity compliance of potential and existing contractors and may charge for and expend amounts received from local units of government for the purpose of developing and providing these contractual services. (2) Not later than November 30, the department of civil rights shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations on the amount of funds received and expended for purposes authorized under this section. Sec. 404. The department of civil rights shall submit quarterly reports to the standard report recipients that include, but are not limited to, all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal quarter: (a) The number of all complaints received by the department by basis of complaint. (b) The number of certified complaint cases initiated by basis of complaint. (c) The number of certified complaint cases completed. (d) The final disposition of certified complaint case investigations. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (e) The average number of days for a case to be completed after certification. (f) The number of FTE positions filled from the FTE authorization for complaint investigations and enforcement. (g) The number of open cases that have been open for more than 1 year. (h) The quotient of the number of certified cases completed divided by the number of filled FTE positions. (i) A listing of amounts awarded to claimants. Sec. 405. On submitting a report or complaint to the United States Commission on Civil Rights or any other federal department, the department of civil rights shall submit a copy of the report or complaint to the standard report recipients not later than the next business day. Sec. 406. From the funds appropriated in part 1, not later than November 30, the department of civil rights shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the Native American boarding school study, if the final report described in section 421 of article 5 of 2022 PA 166 has not been published before that date. The report must include all of the following: (a) Information on the activities conducted for the study by the department of civil rights and any contracted university or entity. (b) Total expenditures to date. (c) The estimated date for publication of the final report. Sec. 411. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for museums support, $500,000.00 must directly be awarded to support an Arab-American museum located in a county with a population over 1,300,000 and in a city with a population of between 105,000 and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 115,000, according to the most recent federal decennial census. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for museums support, $500,000.00 must directly be awarded to an African-American museum in a city with a population greater than 600,000, according to the most recent federal decennial census. (3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for museums support, $500,000.00 must directly be awarded to support a memorial center in a county with a population of between 1,200,000 and 1,300,000 and in a city with a population of between 83,000 and 84,000, according to the most recent federal decennial census. LEGISLATURE Sec. 600. The senate, the house of representatives, or an entity within the legislative branch may receive, expend, and transfer funds in addition to those authorized in part 1. Sec. 601. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 to an entity within the legislative branch must not be expended or transferred to another account without written approval of the authorized agent of the legislative entity. If the authorized agent of the legislative entity notifies the state budget director of its approval of an expenditure or transfer before the year-end book-closing date for that legislative entity, the state budget director shall immediately make the expenditure or transfer. The authorized legislative entity must be designated by the speaker of the house of representatives for house entities, the senate majority leader for senate entities, and the legislative council for legislative council entities. (2) Funds appropriated within the legislative branch, to a legislative council component, must not be expended by any agency 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 or other subgroup included in that component without the approval of the legislative council. Sec. 602. The senate may charge rent and assess charges for utility costs. The amounts received for rent charges and utility assessments are appropriated to the senate for the renovation, operation, and maintenance of the Binsfeld Office Building. Sec. 603. (1) From the appropriation contained in part 1 for national association dues, the first $34,800.00 must be paid to the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws. The remaining funds must be distributed by the legislative council in accordance with subsection (2). (2) If any funds remain after all required dues have been paid under subsection (1), the legislative council may approve the use of not more than $10,000.00 to pay for the registration fees of any state employees who serve as board members to any of the national associations receiving state funds for annual dues to attend that national association's annual conference. If any of the $10,000.00 remains after national board member's registration fees are paid, the legislative council may use the remaining funds to pay for the registration fees for any other state employees to attend the annual conference of any of the national associations receiving state funds for annual dues. Sec. 604. (1) The appropriation in part 1 to the Michigan state capitol historic site includes funds to operate the legislative parking facilities in the capitol area. The Michigan state capitol commission shall establish rules regarding the operation of the legislative parking facilities. (2) The Michigan state capitol commission may collect a fee from state employees and the general public using certain 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 legislative parking facilities. The revenues received from the parking fees are appropriated on receipt and must be allocated by the Michigan state capitol commission. (3) As used in this section, "Michigan state capitol commission" means the Michigan state capitol commission established in the Michigan state capitol historic site act, 2013 PA 240, MCL 4.1945. Sec. 605. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the legislative council are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is publication of the Michigan manual. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $3,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 606. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for property management are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to purchase equipment and services for building maintenance to ensure a safe and productive 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 work environment. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $2,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 607. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for automated data processing are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to purchase equipment, software, and services to support and implement data processing requirements and technology improvements. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $3,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 608. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan capitol committee publications save the flags fund account may accept contributions, gifts, bequests, devises, grants, and donations. Those funds that are not expended in the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 do not lapse at the close of the fiscal year, and must be carried forward for expenditure in the following fiscal years. Sec. 611. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for senate, $250,000.00 must be allocated for an internship program. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for house of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 representatives, $250,000.00 must be allocated for an internship program. Sec. 612. It is the intent of the legislature that, from the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan state capitol commission established in section 5 of the Michigan state capitol historic site act, 2013 PA 240, MCL 4.1945, ensure that the Capitol Building is open for not less than 3 hours on Saturdays that are not state holidays. Sec. 615. If insufficient court fees are collected under the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.101 to 600.9947, to support the legislative retirement system actuarial requirement appropriated under part 1, the amount of the deficiency is appropriated from the general fund. LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR GENERAL Sec. 620. In accordance with section 53 of article IV of the state constitution of 1963, the auditor general shall conduct audits of the executive, judicial, and legislative branches. Sec. 621. (1) The auditor general shall take all reasonable steps to ensure that certified minority- and women-owned and operated accounting firms, accounting firms owned and operated by persons with disabilities, and accounting firms that are geographically disadvantaged business enterprises participate in the audits of the books, accounts, and financial affairs of each principal executive department, branch, institution, agency, and office of this state. (2) If the auditor general contracts with a firm to perform audits of the principal executive departments and state agencies, the auditor general shall strongly encourage the firm to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subcontract with certified minority- and women-owned and operated accounting firms, accounting firms owned and operated by persons with disabilities, and accounting firms that are geographically disadvantaged business enterprises. (3) Not later than November 1, the auditor general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients regarding the number of contracts entered into with certified minority- and women-owned and operated accounting firms, accounting firms owned and operated by persons with disabilities, and accounting firms that are geographically disadvantaged business enterprises. Sec. 622. From the funds appropriated in part 1 to the office of the auditor general, the auditor general's salary and the salaries of the remaining 2.0 FTE unclassified positions must be set by the speaker of the house of representatives, the senate majority leader, the house of representatives minority leader, and the senate minority leader. Sec. 623. Any audits, reviews, or investigations requested of the auditor general by the legislature or by legislative leadership, legislative committees, or individual legislators must include an estimate of the additional costs involved and, if those costs exceed $50,000.00, must provide supplemental funding. The auditor general shall determine whether to perform those activities in accordance with Operations Manual Policy No. 2-26. Sec. 625. A branch, department, office, board, commission, agency, authority, or institution of this state shall not deny the auditor general access to examine its confidential information. The auditor general is subject to the same duty of confidentiality imposed by law on the entity providing the confidential information. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 627. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for field operations are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to conduct the state of Michigan annual comprehensive financial report. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees and contract audits. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $3,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 628. On a quarterly basis, the auditor general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients, the chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees, and the senate and house of representatives oversight committees that includes all of the following information related to projects initiated during the immediately preceding quarter: (a) Audit title. (b) Audit type. (c) Audit period. (d) Audit objectives. (e) Branch of government being audited. (f) Whether the auditor general or a contracted auditor is conducting the audit and, if a contracted auditor is conducting the audit, the identity of the contracted auditor. (g) Details regarding the reason for initiating the audit, including whether it was discretionary or required by statute. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (h) Details regarding any similar audit the auditor general has completed in the past. (i) Estimated time frame for completion of the audit. (j) Estimated total auditor general resources necessary to complete the audit and release a report. Sec. 629. On a quarterly basis, the auditor general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients, the chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees, and the senate and house of representatives oversight committees that includes all of the following information for each project in progress during the immediately preceding quarter: (a) Audit title. (b) Date the audit was initiated. (c) Audit status. (d) Estimated time frame for completion of the audit. (e) Details regarding the resources spent on the audit to date. (f) Estimated total auditor general resources necessary to complete the audit and release a report. Sec. 630. On a quarterly basis, the auditor general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients, the chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees, and the senate and house of representatives oversight committees that contains all of the following information for each project completed during the immediately preceding quarter: (a) Audit title. (b) Date the audit was initiated. (c) Date the audit report was released. (d) Results of the audit, including the number and type of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 findings. (e) Details regarding total auditor general resources spent on the audit. (f) To the extent authorized by law, details regarding any inquiry, tip, or request related to the audit that the auditor general received before initiating the audit. DEPARTMENT OF STATE Sec. 701. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 703. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDOS shall submit quarterly reports on record lookup fees to the standard report recipients. Each report must include the number of records sold and the revenues collected as authorized in section 208b of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.208b, section 7 of 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.297, and sections 80130, 80315, 81114, and 82156 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80130, 324.80315, 324.81114, and 324.82156. Sec. 705. (1) The MDOS may accept gifts, donations, contributions, and grants of money and other property from any private or public source to underwrite, in whole or in part, the cost of a departmental publication that is prepared and disseminated under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923. A private or public funding source may receive written recognition in the publication and may furnish a traffic safety message, subject to approval of the MDOS, for inclusion in the publication. The MDOS may reject a gift, donation, contribution, or grant. The MDOS may furnish copies of a publication underwritten, in whole or in part, by a private source to the underwriter at no charge. (2) The MDOS may sell and accept paid advertising for placement in a departmental publication that is prepared and disseminated under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923. The MDOS may charge and receive a fee for any advertisement appearing in a departmental publication and shall 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 review and approve the content of each advertisement. The MDOS may refuse to accept advertising from any person or organization. The MDOS may furnish a reasonable number of copies of a publication to an advertiser at no charge. (3) Pending expenditure, the funds received under this section must be deposited in the Michigan department of state publications fund created in section 211 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.211. Funds given, donated, or contributed to the MDOS from a private source are appropriated and allocated for the purpose for which the revenue is furnished. Funds granted to the MDOS from a public source are allocated and may be expended on receipt by the MDOS. The MDOS shall not accept a gift, donation, contribution, or grant if receipt is conditioned on a commitment of state funding at a future date. Revenue received from the sale of advertising is appropriated and may be expended on receipt by the MDOS. (4) Any unexpended revenues received under this section must be carried over into subsequent fiscal years and are available for appropriation for the purposes described in this section. (5) Not later than March 1, the MDOS shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The amount of gifts, contributions, donations, and grants of money received by the MDOS under section 705 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119. (b) A list of the expenditures made from the amounts received by the MDOS as reported in subdivision (a). (c) A list of any gift, donation, contribution, or grant of property other than funding received by the MDOS under section 705 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119. (d) The total revenue received from the sale of paid advertising accepted under this section and a statement of the total number of advertising transactions. (6) In addition to copies delivered without charge as the secretary of state considers necessary, the MDOS may sell copies of manuals and other publications regarding the sale, ownership, or operation or regulation of motor vehicles, with amendments, at prices to be established by the secretary of state. As used in this subsection, the term "manuals and other publications" includes videos and proprietary electronic publications. All funds received from sales of these manuals and other publications must be credited to the Michigan department of state publications fund created in section 211 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.211. Sec. 707. Funds collected by the MDOS under section 211 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.211, are appropriated for all expenses necessary to provide for the costs of the publication described in section 211 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.211. Funds are allocated for expenditure when they are received by the department of treasury and do not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year. Sec. 708. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDOS shall use available balances at the end of the state fiscal year to provide payment to the MDSP in the amount of $332,000.00 for the services provided by the traffic accident records program as first appropriated in 1990 PA 196 and 1990 PA 208. Sec. 709. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDOS may restrict funds from miscellaneous revenue to cover cash shortages created from normal branch office operations. The restricted amount 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 must not exceed $50,000.00 of the total funds available in miscellaneous revenue. Sec. 711. Collector plate and fund-raising registration plate revenues collected by the MDOS are appropriated and allotted for distribution to the recipient university or public or private agency overseeing a state-sponsored goal when received. Distributions must occur on a quarterly basis or as otherwise authorized by law. Any revenues remaining at the end of the fiscal year do not lapse to the general fund and remain available for distribution to the university or agency in the next fiscal year. Sec. 713. (1) The MDOS, in collaboration with the Gift of Life Michigan or its successor federally designated organ procurement organization, may develop and administer a public information campaign concerning the Michigan organ donor program. (2) The MDOS may solicit funds from any private or public source to underwrite, in whole or in part, the public information campaign authorized by this section. The MDOS may accept gifts, donations, contributions, and grants of money and other property from private and public sources for this purpose. A private or public funding source underwriting the public information campaign, in whole or in substantial part, shall receive sponsorship credit for its financial backing. (3) Funds received under this section, including grants from state and federal agencies, do not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year and remain available for expenditure for the purposes described in this section. (4) Funding appropriated in part 1 for the organ donor program must be used to produce a pamphlet regarding organ donations and to distribute the pamphlet with driver licenses and personal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 identification cards. The pamphlet must do both of the following: (a) Explain the organ donor program and encourage people to become donors by marking a checkoff on driver license and personal identification card applications. (b) Include a return reply form addressed to the gift of life organization. (5) Funding appropriated in part 1 for the organ donor program must be used to pay for return postage costs of the return reply form described in subsection (4)(b). (6) In addition to the appropriations in part 1, the MDOS may receive and expend funds from the organ and tissue donation education fund for administrative expenses. (7) Not later than March 1, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients. The report must include all of the following: (a) The amount of revenue collected by the MDOS under this section. (b) The purpose of each expenditure. (c) The amount of revenue carried forward. Sec. 714. (1) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (2), not less than 180 days before closing a branch office or consolidating a branch office and not less than 60 days before relocating a branch office, the MDOS shall submit a report to the standard report recipients, the members of the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations, and legislators who represent affected areas. The report must include all of the following: (a) All analyses done regarding criteria for changes in the location of branch offices, including, but not limited to, all of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the following: (i) Branch transactions. (ii) Revenue. (iii) The impact on citizens of the affected area, including information regarding additional distance to branch office locations resulting from the changes. (b) Detailed estimates of costs and savings that will result from the overall changes made to the branch office structure. (c) Detailed estimates of costs for new leased facilities and expansions of current leased space. (2) If the consolidation of a branch office is with another branch office that is located within the same local unit of government or the relocation of a branch office is to another location that is located within the same local unit of government, the MDOS is not required to submit a report under subsection (1). (3) As used in this section, "local unit of government" means a city, village, township, or county. Sec. 715. (1) Any service assessment collected by the MDOS from the user of a credit or debit card under section 3 of 1995 PA 144, MCL 11.23, may be used by the MDOS for necessary expenses related to that service and may be remitted to a credit or debit card company, bank, or other financial institution. (2) The service assessment imposed by the MDOS for credit and debit card services may be based on a percentage of each individual credit or debit card transaction or a flat rate per transaction, or both, scaled to the amount of the transaction. However, the department shall not charge any amount for a service assessment that exceeds the costs billable to the MDOS for the service assessment. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) If there is a balance of service assessments received from credit and debit card services remaining on September 30, the balance may be carried forward to the following fiscal year and appropriated for the same purpose. (4) As used in this section, "service assessment" means costs associated with service fees imposed by credit and debit card companies and processing fees imposed by banks and other financial institutions. Sec. 717. (1) The MDOS may accept gifts, donations, or contributions of property from any private or public source to support, in whole or in part, the operation of a departmental function relating to licensing, regulation, or safety. The MDOS may recognize a private or public contributor for making the contribution. The MDOS may reject a gift, donation, or contribution. Any revenues received under this subsection may be expended for the departmental functions relating to licensing, regulation, or safety. (2) The MDOS shall not accept a gift, donation, or contribution under subsection (1) if receipt of the gift, donation, or contribution is conditioned on a commitment of future state funding. (3) Not later than March 1, the MDOS shall submit a report to the standard report recipients. The report must include a list of each gift, donation, or contribution received by the department under subsection (1) for the immediately preceding calendar year. Sec. 718. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for election regulation, all money must be spent in accordance with the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.1 to 168.992, and the instructions, orders, and guidance of the secretary of state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 regarding the proper method for the conduct and administration of elections. Sec. 719. Not later than February 1, the MDOS shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on all funding allocated to counties, cities, and townships from funds appropriated in part 1 for election administration and services. The report must include the amount and purpose of each payment provided to a county, city, or township. Sec. 722. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, not later than February 1, the MDOS shall submit an expense report related to CARS to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations. The report must include itemized expenditures made on behalf of CARS by fund source in the immediately preceding fiscal year and projected expenditures to be made on behalf of CARS in the current fiscal year and the next fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "CARS" means the customer and automotive records system. Sec. 724. The MDOS shall reimburse a county, city, or township for allowable expenses not later than 60 days after the MDOS receives a bill for allowable expenses and all necessary documentation from the county, city, or township. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, and BUDGET Sec. 801. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $200,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 802. Any proceeds that exceed necessary costs incurred in conducting transfers, auctions, direct sales, or scrapping of state surplus property under section 267 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1267, are appropriated to the MDTMB to offset any costs incurred in the acquisition and distribution of surplus property. The MDTMB shall provide consolidated internet auction services through this state's contractors for all local units of government. Sec. 803. (1) The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized by part 1 for maintenance and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 operation services provided specifically to other principal executive departments or state agencies, the legislative branch, the judicial branch, or private tenants, or provided in connection with facilities transferred to the operational jurisdiction of the MDTMB. (2) The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized by part 1 for real estate, architectural, design, engineering, and project oversight services provided specifically to other principal executive departments or state agencies, the legislative branch, the judicial branch, universities, community colleges, or private tenants. (3) The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in part 1 for mail pickup and delivery services provided specifically to other principal executive departments and state agencies, the legislative branch, or the judicial branch. (4) The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in part 1 for purchasing services provided specifically to other principal executive departments and state agencies, the legislative branch, or the judicial branch. (5) Any revenue collected by the MDTMB from user fees under subsections (1) to (4) must be carried forward and does not lapse to the general fund at the close of the fiscal year. Sec. 805. To the extent a specific appropriation is required for a detailed source of financing included in part 1 for the MDTMB appropriations financed from special revenue and internal service and pension trust funds, or SIGMA user charges, the specific amounts are appropriated within the special revenue internal service and pension trust funds in portions not to exceed the aggregate amount appropriated in part 1. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 807. Funding in part 1 for SIGMA must be funded by proportionate charges assessed against the respective state funds benefiting from the SIGMA project in the amounts determined by MDTMB. Sec. 808. (1) A deposit against the IDG from building occupancy and parking charges appropriated in part 1 must be collected, in part, from state agencies, the legislative branch, and the judicial branch based on estimated costs associated with maintenance and operation of buildings managed by MDTMB. To the extent excess revenue is collected due to estimates of building occupancy charges exceeding actual costs, the excess revenue may be carried forward into subsequent fiscal years for the purpose of returning funds to state agencies. (2) An appropriation in part 1 for building occupancy and parking charges may be increased to return excess revenue collected to state agencies. Sec. 809. On a biannual basis, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on any revisions either individually or in the aggregate that increase or decrease current contracts by more than $500,000.00 for computer software development, hardware acquisition, or quality assurance. Sec. 810. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDTMB shall maintain an internet website that contains notice of all solicitations, invitations for bids, and requests for proposals over $50,000.00 that are issued by the MDTMB or by any state agency operating under delegated authority, except for solicitations up to $500,000.00 in accordance with the MDTMB policy regarding providing opportunities to Michigan small businesses, geographically disadvantaged business enterprises, Michigan veteran-owned 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 business, Michigan service disabled veteran-owned businesses, or Michigan recognized community rehabilitation organizations, or if the MDTMB determines and documents that it is in the best interest of this state. This information must appear on the first page of each department or state agency dashboard. (2) The MDTMB shall set the due date for acceptance of an invitation for bid or request for proposal to not less than 14 days after the notice is made available on the internet website described in subsection (1), unless the MDTMB determines and documents that a different due date is in the best interest of this state. (3) In addition to the requirements of this section, the MDTMB may advertise the solicitations, invitations for bids, and requests for proposals in any manner that the MDTMB determines is appropriate to give the greatest number of persons the opportunity to respond or make bids or requests for proposals. (4) A new request for a proposal that is publicly displayed on the internet website must include the proposal's corresponding department or agency. The internet website must allow for the searching of requests for proposals by department or agency. Sec. 811. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDTMB shall maintain a system that interfaces with other departments and agencies to track the performance of vendors in fulfilling contract obligations. The performance of these vendors must be recorded and used as a factor to determine future contracts awarded in the procurement process. Sec. 813. (1) Funds in part 1 for motor vehicle fleet are appropriated to the MDTMB for administration and the acquisition, lease, operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, and disposal of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 state motor vehicles. (2) The funds described in subsection (1) must be funded by revenue from rates charged to principal executive departments and agencies for utilizing vehicle travel services provided by the MDTMB. Any revenue in excess of the amount appropriated in part 1 from the motor transport fund and any unencumbered funds are restricted revenues and may be carried over into the succeeding fiscal year. (3) The MDTMB shall, not later than 90 days after the close of the fiscal year, submit an annual report to the standard report recipients regarding the operation of the motor vehicle fleet. The report must include all of the following: (a) The number of vehicles assigned to, or authorized for use by, state departments and agencies. (b) The number of vehicles in the motor vehicle fleet. (c) The number of miles driven by fleet vehicles. (d) The number of gallons of fuel consumed by fleet vehicles. (e) A description of fleet garage operations. (f) The goods sold and services provided by the fleet garage. (g) The number of employees assigned to each fleet garage. (4) The information provided under subsection (3) may be adjusted during the fiscal year based on needs and cost savings to achieve the maximum value and efficiency from the state motor fleet. (5) The MDTMB may charge state agencies for fuel cost increases that exceed 10% of the budgeted price per gallon of motor vehicle fuels. The MDTMB shall notify state agencies, in writing or by email, not less than 30 days before implementing additional charges for fuel cost increases. Any revenue received from these 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 charges is appropriated on receipt. (6) The state budget director, on notification to the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations, may adjust spending authorization and the IDG from motor transport fund in the MDTMB to ensure that the appropriations for motor vehicle fleet in the MDTMB budget equal the expenditures for motor vehicle fleet in the budgets for all executive branch agencies. Sec. 820. The MDTMB shall post on its website and make available to the public a list of all parcels of real property owned by this state that are available for purchase. Sec. 822. Not later than January 1, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients related to the salaries of unclassified employees and gubernatorial appointees within all state departments and agencies. The report must enumerate each unclassified employee and gubernatorial appointee and the employee's or appointee's annual salary rounded to the nearest thousand dollars. Sec. 822c. The funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to support any staff effort, projects, consultant expenses, or any other activity related to the development, financing, construction, operation, or implementation of the Gordie Howe International Crossing or any successor project unless the approval of the project is enacted into law. Sec. 822d. Not later than December 31, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all of the following: (a) The fee and rate schedules to be used by state departments and agencies for services, including information technology, provided by the MDTMB during the current fiscal year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The changes from fees and rates charged in the immediately preceding fiscal year. (c) An explanation of the factors that justify each fee and rate increase described in subdivision (b). Sec. 822e. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the funds collected by the MDTMB for supplying census-related information and technical services, publications, statistical studies, population projections and estimates, and other demographic products are appropriated for all expenses necessary to provide the required services. These funds are available for expenditure when they are received and may be carried forward into the next fiscal year. (2) Not later than March 1, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that provides the amount of revenue collected by the MDTMB from the authorization in subsection (1) and the amount of revenue carried forward. Sec. 822h. (1) From the funds in part 1 for capital city services, the MDTMB shall provide reimbursement to a city with a population of between 107,000 and 108,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census to provide support for local infrastructure and municipal services, including, but not limited to, maintenance or improvement of local roads, sidewalks, public utility infrastructure, emergency response, traffic management, or other public safety services that support the state capitol and adjacent state facilities. (2) The MDTMB shall reimburse the city described in subsection (1) quarterly for eligible expenses if the city provides supporting documentation related to the eligible expenses to the MDTMB and the eligible expenses are approved for reimbursement. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) The city described in subsection (1) shall maintain and provide any supporting documentation that is requested for auditing purposes. Sec. 822j. (1) The make it in Michigan competitiveness fund is created within the state treasury. (2) Funds may be spent from the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund only on appropriation or administrative transfer pursuant to subsection (3). (3) A transfer of funds from federal or state restricted contingency funds into make it in Michigan may be made by the state budget director not less than 30 days after notifying each member of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees. Those transfers may be disapproved by either appropriations committee within the 30 days and, if disapproved within that time, are not effective. (4) A transfer approved under this section constitutes authorization to transfer the amount recommended and approved. However, the amount must be reduced by the state budget director to be within the current unobligated amount of the appropriation. (5) Transfers must not be authorized under any of the following circumstances: (a) To create a new line-item appropriation or to create a new state program. (b) To or from an operating appropriation line item that did not appear in the fiscal year appropriation bills for which the transfer is being made. (c) To or from a work project as designated under section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a. (d) Between state governmental funds. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (6) Interest and earnings from the investment of funds deposited in the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund must be deposited in the general fund. (7) Funds in the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund at the close of a fiscal year remain in the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund and do not lapse to the general fund. (8) Funds appropriated or transferred from the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund are available to leverage federal funding opportunities that include, but are not limited to, infrastructure, health, public safety, mobility and electrification, climate and the environment, economic development, or other funding opportunities administered by the federal government. Funding opportunities may be in the form of formula or competitive-based grants, cooperative agreements, or contracts, and may include funds contained in the infrastructure investment and jobs act, Public Law 117-58, the CHIPS act of 2022, division A of Public Law 117-167, the inflation reduction act of 2022, Public Law 117-169, or any other federal acts. (9) The Michigan infrastructure office, in collaboration with the state budget director, shall form an interagency evaluation committee that includes the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy, the MDLEO, the MDOT, the MSF, or other entities at the discretion of the Michigan infrastructure office, to develop program guidelines and selection criteria for the recommended appropriation or transfer of funds. The interagency evaluation committee shall make recommendations to the director of the MDTMB and the state budget director on the disbursement of funds. Funding must also be used to cover all costs related to the administration of this section. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (10) The MDTMB shall inform the legislature not later than 30 days after any federal funds are received that would be used as the basis for recommended appropriations or transfers from the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund. (11) Not later than 90 days after the close of each fiscal year, the MDTMB shall report to the legislature on the projects funded with make it in Michigan competitiveness fund money. MEMORIALS Sec. 822k. The MDTMB may receive and expend funds from the Vietnam veterans memorial monument fund in accordance with the Michigan Vietnam veterans memorial act, 1988 PA 234, MCL 35.1051 to 35.1057. The funds are appropriated and allocated when received by the MDTMB and may be expended on receipt. Sec. 822l. The Michigan veterans' memorial park commission may receive and expend money from any source, public or private, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, donations of money, and government appropriations, for the purposes described in Executive Order No. 2001-10. The funds are appropriated and allocated when received by the Michigan veterans' memorial park commission and may be expended on receipt. Any deposit made under this section and any unencumbered funds are restricted revenues and may be carried over into subsequent fiscal years. Sec. 822m. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDTMB may receive and expend money from the Michigan law enforcement officers memorial monument fund in accordance with the Michigan law enforcement officers memorial act, 2004 PA 177, MCL 28.781 to 28.786. Any deposit made into the fund is restricted revenues and must be carried over into succeeding fiscal years. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Sec. 824. The MDTMB may enter into agreements to provide spatial information and technical services to other principal executive departments, state agencies, local units of government, and other organizations. The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in part 1 for providing information and technical services, publications, maps, and other products. The MDTMB may expend amounts received for salaries, supplies, and equipment necessary to provide informational products and technical services. Sec. 825. (1) The legislature shall have access to all historical and current data contained within SIGMA, or its predecessor, pertaining to state departments. (2) State departments shall have access to all historical and current data contained within SIGMA or its predecessor. Sec. 826. As used in this part and part 1, "information technology services" means services that involve all aspects of managing and processing information, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Application and mobile development and maintenance. (b) Desktop computer support and management. (c) Cybersecurity. (d) Social media. (e) Mainframe computer support and management. (f) Cloud services support and management, including, but not limited to, infrastructure as a service, platform as a service, and software as a service. (g) Local area network support and management, including, but 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 not limited to, wired and wireless network build-out, support, and management. (h) Information technology project management. (i) Information technology procurement and contract management. (j) Telecommunication services, security, infrastructure, and support. (k) Server support and management. (l) Information technology planning and budget management. Sec. 827. (1) The MDTMB shall assess all subscribers of the Michigan public safety communications system reasonable access and maintenance fees and deposit the fees in the Michigan public safety communications systems fees fund. (2) All money received by the MDTMB under this section must be expended for the support and maintenance of the Michigan public safety communications system. (3) Any deposits made under this section and unencumbered funds are restricted revenues and must be carried forward into succeeding fiscal years. Sec. 828. Not later than 45 days after the end of the current fiscal year, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes both of the following: (a) The estimated total amount of funding appropriated for information technology services and projects, by funding source, for all principal executive departments and agencies for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (b) A listing of the expenditures made from the amounts received by the MDTMB as reported in subdivision (a). Sec. 830. (1) Any revenue collected from licenses issued under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the antenna site management project shall be deposited in the antenna site management revolving fund created for this purpose in the MDTMB. The MDTMB may receive and expend money from the fund for costs associated with the antenna site management project, including the cost of a third-party site manager. Any excess revenue remaining in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must be proportionately transferred to the appropriate state restricted funds as designated in a PA or the state constitution of 1963. (2) An antenna must not be placed on any site under this section without complying with the respective local zoning codes and local unit of government processes. Sec. 831. If the MDTMB provides information technology services to a department or agency directly, the MDTMB shall submit a monthly invoice to the department or agency for the information technology services provided. If the MDTMB provides information technology services to a department or agency through a contracted vendor, the MDTMB shall submit an invoice to the department or agency not later than 60 days after the MDTMB receives approval to pay the vendor invoice. Sec. 832. (1) The MDTMB shall inform the senate and house of representatives appropriations subcommittees on general government and the senate and house fiscal agencies not later than 30 days after learning of the proposal of a potential penalty proposed or the assessment of an actual penalty assessed by the federal government for failure of the Michigan child support enforcement system to achieve certification by the federal government. (2) If a potential penalty is proposed by the federal government, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients not later than 90 days after the date the potential 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 penalty is proposed specifying the MDTMB's plans to avoid the assessment of an actual penalty and ensure federal certification of the Michigan child support enforcement system. Sec. 833. (1) The state budget director, on notification to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations, may adjust spending authorization and user fees in the MDTMB to ensure that the appropriations for information technology in the MDTMB equal the appropriations for information technology in the budgets for all executive branch agencies. (2) If, during the fiscal year, a supplemental appropriation or transfer is made under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393, to or from an information technology line item in an agency budget, there is appropriated an equal amount of user fees in the MDTMB to accommodate an increase or decrease in spending authorization. Sec. 837. All information technology projects funded by appropriations in part 1 must do both of the following: (a) Use information technology project management best practices and services as defined or recommended by the enterprise portfolio management office of the MDTMB. (b) Comply with the requirements of the state unified information technology environment methodology as it applies to all information technology project management processes. Sec. 838. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for information technology investment fund must be used for the modernization of state information technology systems, improvement of this state's cybersecurity framework, and to achieve efficiencies. (2) The MDTMB shall develop a plan regarding the use of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 funds appropriated in part 1 for the information technology investment fund. (3) The plan described in subsection (2) must include all of the following: (a) A description of proposed information technology investment projects. (b) The time frame for completion of the information technology investment projects. (c) The initial budgeted amount for each project. (d) The number of employees assigned to implement each information technology investment project. (e) The contracts entered into for each information technology investment project. (f) Any other information the MDTMB considers necessary. (4) The MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes the plan and the anticipated spending reductions or overages for each of the proposed information technology investment projects. The report must also include both of the following: (a) A comparison of the initial budgeted amounts and cumulative costs, both by project and in total for all projects. (b) The amount of any transfer of budgeted funds from 1 project to another. Sec. 839. In addition to the appropriations for enterprisewide information technology investments in part 1, there are appropriated federal funds awarded or otherwise received for initiatives undertaken with the funds in part 1. The receipt of these funds must not result in a gross appropriation that exceeds the amount appropriated for enterprisewide information technology 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 investments. STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY RENT Sec. 842. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for state building authority rent may, in addition to this purpose, be expended for the payment of required premiums for insurance on facilities owned by the state building authority or payment of costs that may be incurred as the result of any deductible provisions in the applicable insurance policies. (2) If the amount appropriated in part 1 for state building authority rent is not sufficient to pay the rent obligations and insurance premiums and deductibles identified in subsection (1) for state building authority projects, there is appropriated from the general fund of this state the amount necessary to pay the obligations. OFFICE OF THE STATE EMPLOYER Sec. 843. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for statewide appropriations must be funded by assessments against longevity and insurance appropriations throughout state government in a manner prescribed by the MDTMB. The funds must be used as specified in joint labor/management agreements, or through the coordinated compensation hearings process. Any deposits of assessments made under this subsection and any unencumbered funds are restricted revenues, may be carried over into the succeeding fiscal years, and are appropriated. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1 for statewide appropriations, the MDTMB may receive and expend funds in the additional amounts specified in joint labor/management 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 agreements, or through the coordinated compensation hearings process, in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as prescribed in subsection (1). Sec. 844. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDTMB may receive and expend funds from other principal executive departments and state agencies to implement administrative leave bank transfer provisions specified in joint labor/management agreements. The funds may also be transferred to other principal executive departments and state agencies under the joint labor/management agreement and any amounts transferred under the joint labor/management agreement are authorized for receipt and expenditure by the receiving principal executive department or state agency. Any funds received by the MDTMB under this section and intended, under the joint labor/management agreements, to be available for use beyond the close of the fiscal year, and any unencumbered funds, may be carried over into the next fiscal year. CIVIL SERVICE COMMISSION Sec. 850. (1) In accordance with section 5 of article XI of the state constitution of 1963, all restricted funds must be assessed a sum not less than 1% of the total aggregate payroll paid from those funds for financing the civil service commission on the basis of actual 1% restricted sources total aggregate payroll of the classified service for the preceding fiscal year. This includes, but is not limited to, restricted funds appropriated in part 1 of any appropriations act. The civil service commission shall return any unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection to each 1% fund source not later than 6 months after the end of the fiscal year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) The appropriations in part 1 are estimates of actual charges based on payroll appropriations. With the approval of the state budget director, the civil service commission may adjust financing sources for civil service charges based on actual payroll expenditures, if the adjustments do not increase the total appropriation for the civil service commission. (3) The financing from restricted sources must be credited to the civil service commission by the end of the second fiscal quarter. Sec. 851. Except where specifically appropriated for this purpose, financing from restricted sources must be credited to the civil service commission. For restricted sources of funding within the general fund that have the legislative authority for carryover, if current spending authorization or revenues are insufficient to accept the charge, the shortage must be taken from carryforward balances of that funding source. Restricted revenue sources that do not have carryforward authority must be utilized to satisfy civil service commission operating deductions first and civil service commission obligations second. General fund dollars are appropriated for any shortfall, if approved by the state budget director. Sec. 852. The appropriation in part 1 to the civil service commission, for state-sponsored group insurance, flexible spending accounts, and COBRA, represents amounts, in part, included within the various appropriations throughout state government for the current fiscal year to fund the flexible spending account program included within the civil service commission. Deposits against state-sponsored group insurance, flexible spending accounts, and COBRA for the flexible spending account program must be made from 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 assessments levied during the fiscal year in a manner prescribed by the civil service commission. Unspent employee contributions to the flexible spending accounts may be used to offset administrative costs for the flexible spending account program, and any remaining balance of unspent employee contributions lapses to the general fund. Sec. 853. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan civil service commission shall continue to work toward completing its review of current employee classifications and educational requirements necessary for employment. On completion of the review, the commission, where possible, shall substitute relevant experience for the default educational requirement of a bachelor's degree. CAPITAL OUTLAY Sec. 860. As used in sections 861 through 875 of this part: (a) "Board" means the state administrative board created in section 1 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.1. (b) "Community college" means a community college organized under the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.1 to 389.195, or under part 25 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1601 to 380.1607, and does not include a state agency or university. (c) "Director" means the director of the MDTMB. (d) "State agency" means an agency of state government. State agency does not include a community college or university. (e) "State building authority" means the authority created in section 2 of 1964 PA 183, MCL 830.412. (f) "University" means a 4-year university supported by this 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 state. University does not include a community college or a state agency. Sec. 861. Each capital outlay project authorized in this part and part 1 or any previous capital outlay act shall comply with the procedures required by the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 862. (1) The MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the JCOS on the status of each planning or construction project financed by the state building authority, this part and part 1, or a previous PA. (2) Before the end of the fiscal year, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the JCOS for each capital outlay project other than lump sums that includes all of the following: (a) The account number and name of each construction project. (b) The balance remaining in each account. (c) The date of the last expenditure from the account. (d) The anticipated date of occupancy if the project is under construction. (e) The appropriations history for the project. (f) The professional service contractor. (g) The amount of the project financed with federal funds. (h) The amount of the project financed through the state building authority. (i) The total authorized cost for the project and the state authorized share if different than the total. (3) Before the end of the fiscal year, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the JCOS on all of the following for each project by a state agency, university, or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 community college that is authorized for planning but is not yet authorized for construction: (a) The name of the project and account number. (b) Whether a program statement is approved. (c) Whether schematics are approved by the MDTMB. (d) Whether preliminary plans are approved by the MDTMB. (e) The name of the professional service contractor. (4) As used in this section, "project" includes appropriation line items made for purchase of real estate. Sec. 864. The appropriations in part 1 for capital outlay must be carried forward at the end of the fiscal year in accordance with section 248 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1248. Sec. 865. (1) A site preparation economic development fund is created in the MDTMB. The MEDC board and the state budget director shall determine whether a specific state-owned site qualifies for inclusion in the site preparation economic development fund. (2) Any proceeds from the sale of an economic development site must be deposited in the site preparation economic development fund and are available for site preparation expenditures, unless otherwise provided by law. The economic development sites are authorized for sale consistent with state law. Expenditures from the site preparation economic development fund are authorized for site preparation activities that enhance the marketable sale value of the economic development sites. (3) A cash advance in an amount of not more than $25,000,000.00 is authorized from the general fund to the site preparation economic development fund. (4) Not later than December 31, the MDTMB shall submit a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations that includes both of the following: (a) The revenue and expenditure activity in the site preparation economic development fund for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (b) The sites identified as economic development sites. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Economic development site" means a state-owned site that is declared as surplus property under section 251 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1251, and would provide economic benefit to the area of the site or to this state. (b) "Site preparation activities" includes, but is not limited to, demolition, environmental studies and abatement, utility enhancement, and site excavation. Sec. 866. (1) The energy efficiency revolving fund is created within the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the energy efficiency revolving fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the energy efficiency revolving fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the energy efficiency revolving fund interest and earnings from energy efficiency revolving fund investments. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the energy efficiency revolving fund, $1,750,000.00 is deposited in the energy efficiency revolving fund. (3) Money in the energy efficiency revolving fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the energy efficiency revolving fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department shall ensure that 50% of the funds 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 deposited in the energy efficiency revolving fund during the fiscal year are made available to community colleges to support qualifying projects in accordance with subsections (6) and (7). (5) All monies received and deposited from any source into the energy efficiency revolving fund are appropriated to support qualifying projects in accordance with subsections (6) and (7). (6) The MDTMB shall provide oversight and direction for the energy efficiency revolving fund, coordinate a call for projects, and prioritize the award of projects that will contribute to a reduction in this state?s carbon footprint. State administrative costs must be not more than 10% of the total project cost. (7) The MDTMB shall set terms with agencies participating in the energy efficiency revolving fund program that include the scope of each project, funding commitments, data collection and reporting requirements, and any other financial terms related to realization of energy savings related to implementation of the project. The MDTMB may enter into a memorandum of understanding to memorialize these terms. (8) Not later than February 1, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on projects funded under this section in the immediately preceding fiscal year. The report must list each approved project, the amount provided from the energy efficiency revolving fund for each project, the department or agency under which the project belongs, anticipated annual savings from each project, and revenue from savings deposited into the energy efficiency revolving fund by project. Sec. 867. In addition to the appropriations for special maintenance, remodeling, and additions for state agencies in part 1, there are appropriated federal funds awarded or otherwise 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 received for initiatives undertaken with the funds in part 1. The receipt of these funds must not result in a gross appropriation that exceeds the amount appropriated for special maintenance, remodeling, and additions for state agencies in part 1. CAPITAL OUTLAY - UNIVERSITIES and COMMUNITY COLLEGES Sec. 873. (1) This section applies only to projects for community colleges. (2) State support is directed towards the remodeling and additions, special maintenance, or construction of certain community college buildings. The community college shall obtain or provide for site acquisition and initial main utility installation to operate the facility. The funding must be composed of local and state shares and not more than 50% of a capital outlay project, not including a lump-sum special maintenance project or remodeling and addition project, for a community college may be appropriated from state and federal funds, unless otherwise appropriated by the legislature. (3) An expenditure under this part and part 1 is authorized when the release of the appropriation is approved by the board on the recommendation of the director. The director may recommend to the board the release of any appropriation in part 1 only after the director is assured that the legal entity operating the community college to which the appropriation is made has complied with this part and part 1 and has matched the amounts appropriated as required by this part and part 1. A release of funds in part 1 must not exceed 50% of the total cost of planning and construction of any project, not including lump-sum remodeling and additions and special maintenance, unless otherwise appropriated by the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 legislature. Further planning and construction of a project authorized by this part and part 1 or applicable sections of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, must be in accordance with the purpose and scope as defined and delineated in the approved program statements and planning documents. This part and part 1 are applicable to all projects for which planning appropriations were made in previous PAs. (4) The community college shall take the steps necessary to secure available federal construction and equipment money for projects funded for construction in this part and part 1 if an application was not previously made. If there is a reasonable expectation that a previous year unfunded application may receive federal money in a subsequent year, the community college shall take whatever action necessary to keep the application active. Sec. 874. If university and community college matching revenues are received in an amount less than the appropriations for capital projects contained in this part and part 1, the state funds must be reduced in proportion to the amount of matching revenue received. Sec. 875. (1) The director may require that community colleges and universities that have an authorized project described in part 1 submit documentation regarding the project match and governing board approval of the authorized project not more than 60 days after the beginning of the fiscal year. (2) If the documentation required by the director under subsection (1) is not submitted, or does not adequately authenticate the availability of the project match or governing board approval of the authorized project, the director may terminate the authorization. The authorization terminates 30 days 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 after the director notifies the JCOS of the intent to terminate the project unless the JCOS approves an extension of the authorization. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY OPERATIONS Sec. 901. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $200,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $40,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 902. (1) Amounts needed to pay for interest, fees, principal, mandatory and optional redemptions, arbitrage rebates as required by federal law, and costs associated with the payment, registration, trustee services, credit enhancements, and issuing costs in excess of the amount appropriated to the department of treasury in part 1 for debt service on notes and bonds that are issued by this state under sections 14, 15, or 16 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, as implemented by 1967 PA 266, MCL 17.451 to 17.455, are appropriated. (2) In addition to the amount appropriated to the department of treasury for debt service in part 1, there is appropriated an amount for fiscal year cash-flow borrowing costs to pay for interest on interfund borrowing authorized under 1967 PA 55, MCL 12.51 to 12.53. (3) In addition to the amount appropriated to the department of treasury for debt service in part 1, all repayments received by this state on loans made from the school bond loan fund that the state treasurer determines are not required to be deposited in the school loan revolving fund under section 4 of 1961 PA 112, MCL 388.984, are appropriated to the department of treasury for the payment of debt service, including, but not limited to, optional and mandatory redemptions, on bonds, notes, or commercial paper issued by this state under 1961 PA 112, MCL 388.981 to 388.985. Sec. 902a. As a condition of receiving the appropriations in part 1, not later than 30 days after a refunding or restructuring bond issue is sold, the department of treasury must submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations. The report 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 must include all of the following: (a) A comparison of the annual debt service before the refinancing or restructuring to the annual debt service after the refinancing or restructuring. (b) The change in the principal and interest over the duration of the debt. (c) The projected change in the present value of the debt service as a result of the refinancing and restructuring. Sec. 902b. As a condition of receiving the appropriations in part 1, not later than 30 days after the state of Michigan comprehensive annual financial report under section 494 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1494, is published, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on all funds that are controlled or administered by the department of treasury and not appropriated in part 1. The current and all previous reports prepared as required under this section must be saved and made available on the department of treasury's public website and stored in a common location with all other reports that the department of treasury is required by law to prepare. The link to the location of the reports must be clearly indicated on the main page of the department of treasury's internet website. The report must include all of the following information for each fund for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The starting balance. (b) Total revenue generated by transfers in and investments. (c) Total expenditures. (d) The ending balance. Sec. 903. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may contract with law firms or private 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 collection agencies to collect taxes and other accounts due this state or due a city for which the department of treasury has entered into an agreement to provide tax administration services. In addition to the amounts appropriated in part 1 to the department of treasury, there are appropriated amounts necessary to fund the cost of these collections, including infrastructure costs. The additional amounts appropriated under this subsection must not exceed 25% of the collections or 2.5% plus operating costs, as applicable. Each contract must prescribe the applicable amount. The amounts appropriated to fund collection costs and fees under this subsection are appropriated from the fund or account to which the corresponding taxes and other accounts being collected are recorded or dedicated. However, if the taxes and other accounts collected are dedicated for a specific purpose under the state constitution of 1963, the amounts appropriated under this subsection are appropriated from the general purpose account of the general fund. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may contract with law firms or private collections agencies to collect defaulted student loans and other accounts due the Michigan guaranty agency. In addition to the amounts appropriated in part 1 to the department of treasury, there are appropriated amounts necessary to fund collection costs and fees not to exceed 24.34% of the collection or a lesser amount as prescribed by the contract. The amounts appropriated under this subsection are appropriated from the fund or account to which the revenues being collected are recorded or dedicated. (3) By November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations. The 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 report must include all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The name of each law firm and each private collection agency that the department of treasury contracted with under subsection (1) or (2). (b) The amount collected under each contract. (c) The costs of collection under each contract. (d) Any other information that is pertinent to determining whether the authority described in subsection (1) or (2) should be continued. Sec. 904. (1) The bureau of investments of the department of treasury may charge an investment service fee against the applicable retirement funds. The revenue from the investment service fees charged under this subsection may be expended for necessary salaries, wages, contractual services, supplies, materials, equipment, travel, worker's compensation insurance premiums, and grants to the civil service commission retirement fund and the state employees' retirement fund. If the bureau of investments of the department of treasury charges a total amount of investment service fees under this subsection that is greater than the aggregate amount appropriated in part 1, the bureau of investments of the department of treasury shall periodically repay the surplus revenue to the applicable retirement funds. The department of treasury shall maintain accounting records in sufficient detail to enable repayment under this subsection. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1 from the retirement funds to the department of treasury, there is appropriated from retirement funds an amount sufficient to pay for the services of money managers, investment advisors, investment 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 consultants, custodians, or other outside professionals that the state treasurer considers necessary to prudently manage the retirement funds' investment portfolios. The state treasurer shall submit an annual report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations regarding the performance of each portfolio delineated by investment advisor. (3) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that identifies the service fees assessed against each retirement system under subsection (1) and the methodology used for assessment. Sec. 904a. (1) There is appropriated an amount sufficient to recognize and pay expenditures for financial services provided by financial institutions or equivalent vendors that perform these financial services, including the department of treasury, as provided under section 1 of 1861 PA 111, MCL 21.181. (2) The appropriations under subsection (1) must be funded by restricting revenues from common cash interest earnings and investment earnings in an amount sufficient to cover these expenditures. If the amounts of common cash interest earnings are insufficient to cover these expenditures, miscellaneous revenues must be used to fund the remaining balance of these expenditures. Sec. 905. The municipal finance fee fund is created in the department of treasury as a revolving fund. The department of treasury shall deposit the fees that the department of treasury collects under the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821, into the municipal finance fee fund. The money in the fund at the end of the fiscal year may be carried forward for future appropriation. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 906. (1) The department of treasury shall charge for audits as allowed under state or federal law or under a contract between the department of treasury and a local unit of government, other principal executive department, or state agency. However, the department of treasury shall not charge more than the actual cost for performing the audit. Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes details of the audits performed and audit charges for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (2) The audit charges fund is created in the department of treasury as a revolving fund. The department of treasury shall deposit the contractual charges collected under subsection (1) into the audit charges fund. The money in the fund at the end of the fiscal year may be carried forward for future appropriation. Sec. 907. (1) The department of treasury shall create and operate a property assessor certification and training program. The purpose of the program is to offer courses in assessment administration. (2) The assessor certification and training fund is created in the department of treasury as a revolving fund. The department of treasury shall use the money in the assessor certification and training fund to create and operate the property assessor certification and training program described in subsection (1). (3) Each participant in the program shall pay to the department of treasury an examination fee not to exceed $50.00 per examination and a certification fee not to exceed $175.00. In addition, each participant shall pay a fee to cover the expenses incurred in offering the program to certified assessing personnel and other individuals interested in an assessment career 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 opportunity. The department of treasury shall deposit the fees collected under this subsection into the property assessor certification and training program fund. Sec. 908. The amount appropriated in part 1 for the home heating assistance program is to cover the costs, including data processing, of administering federal home heating credits to eligible claimants and of administering the supplemental fuel cost payment program for eligible tax credit and welfare recipients. Sec. 909. Revenue from the airport parking tax act, 1987 PA 248, MCL 207.371 to 207.383, is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 7a of the airport parking tax act, 1987 PA 248, MCL 207.377a. Sec. 910. The disbursement by the department of treasury from the bottle deposit fund to dealers as required by section 3c(3) of 1976 IL 1, MCL 445.573c, is appropriated. Sec. 911. (1) There is appropriated an amount sufficient to recognize and pay refundable tax credits, tax refunds, and interest as provided by law. (2) The appropriations under subsection (1) must be funded by restricting tax revenue in an amount sufficient to cover these expenditures. Sec. 912. A plaintiff in a garnishment action involving this state shall pay to the state treasurer 1 of the following: (a) A fee of $6.00 at the time a writ of garnishment of periodic payments is served on the state treasurer, as provided in section 4012 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.4012. (b) A fee of $6.00 at the time any other writ of garnishment is served on the state treasurer. However, the fee must be reduced 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to $5.00 for each writ of garnishment for individual income tax refunds or credits that is filed electronically. Sec. 913. (1) The department of treasury may contract with private firms to appraise and, if necessary, appeal the assessments of senior citizen cooperative housing units. Payment for this service must be made from the savings that result from the appraisal or appeal process being conducted by private firms. (2) The department of treasury may use a portion of the funds appropriated in part 1 for the senior citizen cooperative housing tax exemption program for an audit of the program. The department of treasury shall submit copies of any completed audit report to the standard report recipients. The department of treasury may use not more than 1% of the funds for administering and auditing the program. Sec. 914. The department of treasury may provide a $200.00 annual prize from the Ehlers internship award account in the gifts, bequests, and deposit fund to the runner-up of the Rosenthal prize for interns. The Ehlers internship award account is interest bearing. Sec. 915. As required under section 61 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.261, there is appropriated from the general fund to the state campaign fund an amount equal to the amounts designated for the 2023 tax year. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the amount appropriated does not revert to the general fund and remains in the state campaign fund. Any amount that remains in the state campaign fund in excess of $10,000,000.00 on December 31 reverts to the general fund. Sec. 916. (1) The department of treasury may make available to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 an interested entity a customized list of otherwise unavailable nonconfidential information regarding unclaimed property that is in the department of treasury's possession. The department of treasury shall charge for this information as follows: (a) For 1 to 100,000 records, 2.5 cents per record. (b) For 100,001 or more records, 0.5 cents per record. (2) The revenue received under subsection (1) must be deposited in the revenue account or fund that is associated with the applicable unclaimed property. (3) Not later than June 1, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations that states the amount of revenue received from the sale of the information under this section. Sec. 917. (1) There is appropriated for write-offs and advances an amount equal to total write-offs and advances for departmental programs. The amount appropriated under this subsection must not exceed current year authorizations that would otherwise lapse to the general fund. (2) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients. The report must include all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The amounts appropriated for write-offs and advances under subsection (1). (b) An explanation for each write-off or advance under subsection (1). Sec. 919. (1) From funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may contract with private auditing firms to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 audit for and collect unclaimed property due this state in accordance with the uniform unclaimed property act, 1995 PA 29, MCL 567.221 to 567.265. In addition to the amounts appropriated in part 1 to the department of treasury, there are appropriated amounts necessary to fund auditing and collection costs and fees not to exceed 12% of the collections or a lesser amount as prescribed by the applicable contract. The appropriation to fund collection costs and fees for the auditing and collection of unclaimed property due this state is from the fund or account to which the revenues being collected are recorded or dedicated. (2) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations. The report must include all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The name of each auditing firm that the department of treasury contracted with under subsection (1). (b) The amount collected by each of the auditing firms. (c) The costs of collection. (d) Any other information that is pertinent to determining whether the authority under subsection (1) should be continued. Sec. 920. Not later than June 30, from the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury shall do both of the following: (a) Produce a list of all personal property tax reimbursement payments to be distributed in the current fiscal year by the local community stabilization authority. (b) Post the list produced under subdivision (a) on the department of treasury's public website. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 921. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury shall, for each revenue administrative bulletin, administrative rule that involves tax administration or collection, and notice interpreting a change in law, submit a notification to every member of the legislature. The department of treasury shall submit the notification not later than 3 days after the department of treasury posts the notification. Each notification must include all of the following: (a) A summary of the proposed changes from current procedures. (b) Identification of industries that will or might be affected by the bulletin, rule, or notice. (c) A statement of the potential fiscal implications of the bulletin, rule, or notice. This subdivision does not apply to a bulletin, rule, or notice that is a routine update of a tax or interest rate required by statute. (d) A summary of the reason for the proposed change. Sec. 924. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may receive and expend principal residence audit fund revenue for administration of principal residence audits under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155. (2) Not later than December 31, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes the amount of exemptions denied and the revenue received under the program described in subsection (1) for the immediately preceding fiscal year. Sec. 927. The department of treasury shall submit a progress report regarding essential service assessment audits to the standard report recipients. The report must include all of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 following: (a) The number of audits. (b) The revenue generated from the audits. (c) The number of complaints received by the department of treasury related to the audits. Sec. 928. The department of treasury may provide receipt, check and cash processing, data, collection, investment, fiscal agent, levy and check cost assessment, writ of garnishment, and other user services on a contractual basis for other principal executive departments and state agencies. Funds for the services provided are appropriated and must be expended for salaries, wages, fees, supplies, and equipment necessary to provide the services. Money in the fund that is unobligated at the end of the fiscal year lapses to the general fund. Sec. 930. (1) The department of treasury shall provide accounts receivable collections services to other principal executive departments and state agencies in accordance with 1927 PA 375, MCL 14.131 to 14.134, or to a city with which the department of treasury has contracted to provide tax administration services. The department of treasury shall deduct a fee equal to the cost of collections from all receipts except for unrestricted general fund collections. Fees must be credited to a restricted revenue account and are appropriated to the department of treasury to pay for the cost of collections. If the department of treasury deducts fees under this subsection that total an amount that is greater than the actual cost of the collections, the department of treasury shall periodically repay the surplus to the respective account. The department of treasury shall maintain accounting records in sufficient detail to enable repayment under this subsection. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes the following information regarding subsection (1) for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The principal executive departments and state agencies served. (b) The funds collected. (c) The costs of collection. Sec. 931. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the appropriation in part 1 to the department of treasury for treasury fees must be assessed against all restricted funds that receive common cash earnings or other investment income. This subsection does not apply to federal or state restricted funds that are temporary in nature or otherwise do not qualify to be assessed treasury fees. The fee assessed against each restricted fund must be based on the size of the restricted fund, calculated as the absolute value of the average daily cash balance plus the market value of investments in the immediately preceding fiscal year, and the level of resources necessary to maintain the restricted fund as required by each department. Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that identifies the fees assessed against each restricted fund and the methodology used for the assessment. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may receive and expend investment fees that are related to new restricted funding sources that participate in common cash earnings or other investment income during the current fiscal year. (3) As used in this section, "treasury fees" includes all 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 costs, including administrative overhead, that are related to the investment of a restricted fund. Sec. 932. The board of directors of the Michigan education trust may expend revenue received under the Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442, for necessary salaries, wages, supplies, contractual services, equipment, worker's compensation insurance premiums, and grants to the civil service commission retirement fund and the state employees' retirement fund. Sec. 933. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for MiABLE administrative fee assistance, the department shall reimburse asset-based fees charged under section 3(7)(e) and maintenance fees charged under section 3(6)(f) of 2015 PA 160. Sec. 934. (1) The department of treasury may expend revenues received under the hospital finance authority act, 1969 PA 38, MCL 331.31 to 331.84, the shared credit rating act, 1985 PA 227, MCL 141.1051 to 141.1076, the higher education facilities authority act, 1969 PA 295, MCL 390.921 to 390.934, the Michigan public educational facilities authority, Executive Reorganization Order No. 2002-3, MCL 12.192, the Michigan tobacco settlement finance authority act, 2005 PA 226, MCL 129.261 to 129.279, the land bank fast track act, 2003 PA 258, MCL 124.751 to 124.774, part 505 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.50501 to 324.50522, the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1401 to 125.1499c, and the MFA, Executive Reorganization Order No. 2010-2, MCL 12.194, for necessary salaries, wages, supplies, contractual services, equipment, worker's compensation insurance premiums, grants to the civil service commission retirement fund and the state employees' 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 retirement fund, and other expenses as allowed under those acts or executive reorganization orders. (2) Not later than January 31, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes both of the following for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The amount and purpose of expenditures of $250,000.00 or more that are made under subsection (1) from funds received by the department of treasury that are in addition to those appropriated in part 1. (b) A list of reimbursement of revenue, if any. Sec. 935. The position of student loan ombudsman is created in the department of treasury's advocacy services team. The student loan ombudsman serves as an advocate for borrowers and shall work with the financial resource navigator within the department of lifelong learning and potential to provide technical assistance to individuals taking out or paying off student loans. Sec. 936. Revenue collected in the state forensic laboratory fund is appropriated and shall be distributed in accordance with section 7 of the forensic laboratory funding act, 1994 PA 35, MCL 12.207. Sec. 937. As a condition of receiving funds in part 1, not later than March 31, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house standing committees on appropriations regarding the department?s collection efforts relative to delinquent accounts. The report must include all of the following: (a) Information regarding the effectiveness of the department of treasury's current collection strategies, including the use of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vendors or contractors. (b) The amount of delinquent accounts. (c) The liquidation rates for declining delinquent accounts. (d) The profile of uncollected delinquent accounts, including specific uncollected amounts by category. (e) The department of treasury's strategy to manage delinquent accounts when those accounts exceed the collectible period. (f) A summary of the strategies used in other states, including, but not limited to, secondary placement services, and assessing the benefits of those strategies. Sec. 938. Revenue collected in the qualified heavy equipment rental personal property exemption reimbursement fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 9 of the qualified heavy equipment rental personal property specific tax act, 2022 PA 35, MCL 211.1129. Sec. 939. Revenue deposited in the local government reimbursement fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 3a of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.253a. Sec. 940. (1) The election administration support fund is created in the state treasury. (2) Any unexpended funds in the election administration support fund must be carried forward and are available for expenditure under this section. (3) Funds may be spent from the election administration support fund only on appropriation, or legislative transfer pursuant to section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 any source for deposit in the election administration support fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the election administration support fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the election administration support fund interest and earnings from the election administration support fund. (5) Funds in the election administration support fund at the close of the fiscal year remain in the election administration support fund and do not lapse to the general fund. (6) Funds appropriated in part 1 for election administration support fund must be deposited in the election administration support fund. Sec. 941. (1) Not later than November 1, from the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury, in conjunction with the MSF, shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations on the annual cost of the MEGA tax credits. The report must include, for each year from 1995 to the expiration of the MEGA tax credit program, the board-approved credit amount, adjusted for credit amendments if applicable, and the actual and projected value of tax credits. For years for which credit claims are complete, the report must include the total of actual certificated credit amounts. For years for which claims are still pending or not yet submitted, the report must include a combination of actual credits if available and projected credits. Credit projections must be based on updated estimates of employees, wages, and benefits for eligible companies. (2) In addition to the report under subsection (1), not later than November 1, the department of treasury, in conjunction with the MSF, shall submit a report to the standard report recipients 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations on the annual cost of all other certificated credits by program for each year until the credits expire or can no longer be collected. The report must include estimates on the brownfield redevelopment credit, film credits, MEGA photovoltaic technology credit, MEGA polycrystalline silicon manufacturing credit, MEGA vehicle battery credit, and other certificated credits. Sec. 942. (1) The community infrastructure fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall make a deposit of $372,466,000.00 general fund/general purpose into the community infrastructure fund, of which $200,000,000.00 shall be a 1-time deposit. (3) Funds may be spent from the community infrastructure fund only upon appropriation, or legislative transfer under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit in the community infrastructure fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the community infrastructure fund. The state treasurer shall credit the community infrastructure fund interest and earnings from the fund. (5) Any unexpended funds in the community infrastructure fund must be carried forward and are available for expenditure under this section. (6) Funds in the community infrastructure fund at the close of the fiscal year remain in the community infrastructure fund and do not lapse to the general fund. (7) Funds appropriated to the community infrastructure fund are available to support local infrastructure investments 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 including, but not limited to, transportation, water, and public safety initiatives. Sec. 943. (1) From the appropriation in part 1 for community aid for responders and emergency services, the department of treasury shall award grants to eligible local units of government as follows: (a) $60,000,000.00 to counties as provided in subsection (2). (b) $40,000,000.00 to each eligible city, village, and township as provided in subsection (3). A city, village, or township is an eligible city, village, or township if both of the following conditions are met: (i) The city, village, or township has population of 7,500 or more and less than 600,000 according to the most recent decennial federal census. (ii) The city, village, or township has a per capita taxable value of $45,000.00 or less, as determined under subsection (3)(a). (c) $18,000,000.00 to a city with a population greater than 600,000 according the most recent decennial federal census for the purposes described in subsection (4). (2) The community aid for responders and emergency services payment for each county is determined by dividing $60,000,000.00 by a number, determined by the sum of the adjusted taxable value population calculated under section 955(4)(d) for all counties, and multiplying that by the result from section 955(4)(d) for that county. (3) The community aid for responders and emergency services payment for each eligible city, village, and township is determined by dividing $40,000,000.00 by a number, determined by the sum of the adjusted taxable value population calculated under section 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 952(4)(d) for all eligible cities, villages, and townships, and multiplying that result by the result from section 952(4)(d) for that eligible city, village, or township. (4) The community aid for responders and emergency services payments described in this section must be expended on activities, personnel, equipment, programs, or materials intended to prevent, reduce, or redress crime. Eligible uses include, but are not limited to: (a) Support for police, fire, or emergency services that improve public safety. (b) Support for prosecutors' activities pertaining to active and backlogged caseload litigation.? (c) Community violence intervention efforts. (d) Mental health resources, treatment, and services. (e) Substance abuse resources, treatment, and services. (f) Emergency 9-1-1 infrastructure. (5) In order to receive community aid for responders and emergency services payments under this section, each city, village, township, or county must maintain for the fiscal year in which the payment is received a level of funding for its police department and for its prosecutor's office, as applicable, not less than the level of funding each of those entities received in the fiscal year immediately preceding the payments. (6) If the attorney general finds and reports to the department that a board, sheriff, or prosecutor declares a city, village, township, or county will not be in compliance with the amendment V or XIV of the Constitution of the United States in regards to all residents of the community, or if the attorney general finds and reports to the department that a preponderance of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 evidence has been found that a city, village, township, or county has violated the amendment V or XIV of the Constitution of the United States, the department shall withhold all payments under this section for the remainder of the fiscal year. (7) Not later than September 30, 2026, each county, city, village, or township receiving a payment under this section shall submit a report of the department of treasury that contains each of the following: (a) A statement of the total amount of the received payment expended. (b) A description of the uses of the received payment sufficient to demonstrate how these expenditures met the intended purpose of the community aid for responders and emergency services as described in subsection (4). Sec. 944. From the funds appropriated in part 1, if the department of treasury hires a pension plan consultant using any of the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury shall do all of the following: (a) Retain each report provided to the department of treasury by that consultant. (b) Notify the standard report recipients that the department of treasury has hired a pension plan consultant, including the reason why the department of treasury hired the pension plan consultant. (c) Make a report described in subdivision (a) available to a standard report recipient if requested by the standard report recipient. Sec. 945. From the funds appropriated in part 1, audits of local unit assessment administration practices, procedures, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 records must be conducted in each assessment jurisdiction a minimum of 1 time every 5 years and in accordance with section 10g of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.10g. Sec. 946. Revenue collected in the convention facility development fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with sections 8, 9, and 10 of the state convention facility development act, 1985 PA 106, MCL 207.628, 207.629, and 207.630. Sec. 947. It is the intent of the legislature that financial independence teams cooperate with the financial responsibility section to coordinate and streamline efforts in identifying and addressing fiscal emergencies in school districts and intermediate school districts. Sec. 949. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may contract with private agencies to prevent the disbursement of fraudulent tax refunds. In addition to the amounts appropriated in part 1 to the department of treasury, there are appropriated amounts necessary to pay the costs of the contracts or to fund operations designed to reduce fraudulent income tax refund payments. The additional amount appropriated under this subsection must not be greater than $2,000,000.00. The appropriation to fund fraud prevention efforts under this subsection is from the fund or account to which the revenues being collected are recorded or dedicated. (2) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations. The report must include all of the following for the immediately preceding fiscal year: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The number of refund claims denied because of the fraud prevention operations. (b) The amount of refunds denied. (c) The costs of the fraud prevention operations. (d) Any other information that is pertinent to determining whether the authority under subsection (1) should be continued. Sec. 949a. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for city income tax administration program, the department of treasury may expand its individual income tax administration for any additional cities that enter into service-level agreements with the department of treasury for this purpose. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, any additional local funds received as part of the service-level agreements are appropriated to the department for staffing and administration of the program. Sec. 949b. Tax capture revenues collected in accordance with written agreements under the good jobs for Michigan program and transferred from the general fund for deposit into the good jobs for Michigan fund, including tax capture revenues collected for calculated payments from the good jobs for Michigan fund to authorized businesses and distributions to the MSF for administrative expenses, are appropriated in accordance with chapter 8D of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090g to 125.2090j. Sec. 949c. From the funds appropriated in part 1, funds must be expended in coordination with the department of agriculture and rural development to improve the timely processing and issuance of tax credits from the Michigan's farmland and open space preservation program created under section 36109 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 324.36109, for the Michigan's farmland and open space preservation program under parts 361 and 362 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36101 to 324.36116 and 324.36201 to 324.36207, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Timely review of mailed applications and paperwork. (b) Timely and proactive communications to applicants regarding the status of the applicant's application. (c) A clear and understood timeline for the issuance of any tax credits. Sec. 949d. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for financial review commission, the department of treasury shall continue financial review commission efforts in the current fiscal year. The purpose of the funding is to cover ongoing costs associated with the operation of the commission. (2) The department of treasury shall identify specific outcomes and performance measures for this initiative, including, but not limited to, the department of treasury's ability to perform a critical fiscal review to ensure the city of Detroit does not reenter distress following its exit from bankruptcy and to ensure that the community district does not enter distress and maintains a balanced budget. (3) Not later than March 15, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes both of the following: (a) A description of the specific outcomes and measures required in subsection (1). (b) The results and data related to these outcomes and measures. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 949e. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the state essential services assessment program, the department of treasury shall administer the state essential services assessment program. The purpose of the program is to provide a phased-in replacement of locally collected personal property taxes on eligible manufacturing personal property. The program must provide the department of treasury with the ability to collect the state essential services assessment. Sec. 949f. Revenue from the tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA 327, MCL 205.421 to 205.436, related to counties with a population of more than 2,000,000 according to the 2000 federal decennial census is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 12(2)(e) of the tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA 327, MCL 205.432. Sec. 949h. Revenue from part 6 of the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27601 to 333.27605, is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with part 6 of the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27601 to 333.27605. Sec. 949i. Revenue from the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967, is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967. Sec. 949j. All funds in the wrongful imprisonment compensation fund created in the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757, are appropriated and available for expenditure. Expenditures are limited to support wrongful imprisonment compensation payments under section 6 of the wrongful 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1756. Sec. 949k. There is appropriated an amount equal to the tax captured revenues due under approved transformational brownfield plans created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. Sec. 949m. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan infrastructure council shall plan, conduct, and contract for asset management improvement activities, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (a) Infrastructure data collection activities. (b) Asset manager training. (c) Development of a 30-year asset management plan for this state. (d) Assistance in asset management improvement projects, including maintaining an asset management portal. (e) Any other projects that promote improved asset management for infrastructure in this state. Sec. 949n. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the money in the fostering futures scholarship trust fund, including any money received as gifts or donations to the fostering futures scholarship trust fund, is appropriated and the department of treasury may issue payments in compliance with the fostering futures scholarship trust fund act, 2008 PA 525, MCL 722.1021 to 722.1031. ?Sec. 949o. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for liability reimbursement, the department shall reimburse county treasurers on a case-by-case basis for the cost of liabilities due to a court order or settlement issued for actions taken by a county treasurer that was in compliance with state law. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) In order to receive a reimbursement as described in subsection (1), a county treasurer must demonstrate in writing to the department of treasury that the liability is due to a court order or settlement resulting from action that was in compliance with Michigan statute at the time it occurred. REVENUE SHARING Sec. 950. The department of treasury shall distribute the funds appropriated in part 1 for constitutional revenue sharing to cities, villages, and townships, as required under section 10 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Revenue collected in accordance with section 10 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 in excess of the amount appropriated in part 1 for constitutional revenue sharing is appropriated for distribution to cities, villages, and townships, on a population basis as required under section 10 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Sec. 952. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for city, village, and township revenue sharing are for grants to cities, villages, and townships and must be distributed as provided in this section. (2) From the first $299,126,400.00 appropriated in part 1 for city, village, and township revenue sharing, each city, village, or township shall receive an amount equal to 100.0% of the revenue sharing payment for which the city, village, or township would have been eligible to receive under section 952 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119, rounded to the nearest dollar, regardless of whether any limitation or eligibility criteria under section 952 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 was satisfied. (3) The remaining amount appropriated in part 1 for city, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 village, and township revenue sharing after the distributions under subsection (2) must be distributed as follows: (a) 1/3 shall be distributed as taxable value payments as provided under subsection (4). (b) 1/3 must be distributed as unit type population payments as provided under subsection (5). (c) 1/3 must be distributed as yield equalization payments as provided under subsection (6). (4) A taxable value payment must be made to each city, village, and township, determined as follows: (a) Determine the per capita taxable value for each city, village, and township by dividing the taxable value of that city, village, or township by the population of that city, village, or township. (b) Determine the statewide per capita taxable value by dividing the total taxable value of all cities, villages, and townships by the total population of all cities, villages, and townships. (c) Determine the per capita taxable value ratio for each city, village, and township by dividing the statewide per capita taxable value by the per capita taxable value for that city, village, or township. (d) Determine the adjusted taxable value population for each city, village, and township by multiplying the per capita taxable value ratio as determined under subdivision (c) for that city, village, or township by the population of that city, village, or township. (e) Determine the total statewide adjusted taxable value population, which is the sum of all adjusted taxable value 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 population for all cities, villages, and townships. (f) Determine the taxable value payment rate by dividing the amount to be distributed under this subsection by the total statewide adjusted taxable value population as determined under subdivision (e). (g) Determine the taxable value payment for each city, village, and township by multiplying the result under subdivision (f) by the adjusted taxable value population for that city, village, or township. (5) A unit type population payment must be made to each city, village, and township, determined as follows: (a) Determine the unit type population weight factor for each city, village, and township as follows: (i) For a township with a population of 5,000 or less, 1.0. (ii) For a township with a population of more than 5,000 but less than 10,001, 1.2. (iii) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (xix), for a township with a population of more than 10,000 but less than 20,001, 1.44. (iv) For a township with a population of more than 20,000 but less than 40,001, 4.32. (v) For a township with a population of more than 40,000 but less than 80,001, 5.18. (vi) For a township with a population of more than 80,000, 6.22. (vii) For a village with a population of 5,000 or less, 1.5. (viii) For a village with a population of more than 5,000 but less than 10,001, 1.8. (ix) For a village with a population of more than 10,000, 2.16. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (x) For a city with a population of 5,000 or less, 2.5. (xi) For a city with a population of more than 5,000 but less than 10,001, 3.0. (xii) For a city with a population of more than 10,000 but less than 20,001, 3.6. (xiii) For a city with a population of more than 20,000 but less than 40,001, 4.32. (xiv) For a city with a population of more than 40,000 but less than 80,001, 5.18. (xv) For a city with a population of more than 80,000 but less than 160,001, 6.22. (xvi) For a city with a population of more than 160,000 but less than 320,001, 7.46. (xvii) For a city with a population of more than 320,000 but less than 640,001, 8.96. (xviii) For a city with a population of more than 640,000, 10.75. (xix) For a township that has a population of not less than 10,000 and certifies to the department of treasury that the township provides for or makes available all of the following, the township receives the unit type population weight factor for a city with the same population: (A) Fire services. (B) Police services on a 24-hour basis either through contracting for or directly employing personnel. (C) Water services to 50% or more of its residents. (D) Sewer services to 50% or more of its residents. (b) Determine the adjusted unit type population for each city, village, and township by multiplying the unit type population 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 weight factor for that city, village, or township as determined under subdivision (a) by the population of the city, village, or township. (c) Determine the total statewide adjusted unit type population, which is the sum of the adjusted unit type population for all cities, villages, and townships. (d) Determine the unit type population payment rate by dividing the amount to be distributed under this subsection by the total statewide adjusted unit type population as determined under subdivision (c). (e) Determine the unit type population payment for each city, village, and township by multiplying the result under subdivision (d) by the adjusted unit type population for that city, village, or township. (6) A yield equalization payment must be made to each city, village, and township in an amount that is sufficient to provide the guaranteed tax base for a local tax effort, but not to exceed 0.02. The payment must be determined as follows: (a) The guaranteed tax base is the maximum combined state and local per capita taxable value that can be guaranteed in a state fiscal year to each city, village, and township for a local tax effort, not to exceed 0.02, if an amount equal to the amount described in subsection (3)(c) is distributed to cities, villages, and townships whose per capita taxable value is below the guaranteed tax base. (b) The full yield equalization payment to each city, village, and township is the product of the amounts determined under subparagraphs (i) and (ii): (i) An amount greater than zero that is equal to the difference 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 between the guaranteed tax base determined in subdivision (a) and the per capita taxable value of the city, village, or township. (ii) The local tax effort of the city, village, or township, not to exceed 0.02, multiplied by the population of that city, village, or township. (7) For purposes of this section, any city, village, or township that completely merges with another city, village, or township must be treated as a single entity, so that when determining the eligible city, village, and township revenue sharing payment under section 952 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 for the combined single entity, the city, village, and township revenue sharing amount that each of the merging local units of government was eligible to receive under section 952 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 is summed. Sec. 954. (1) Cities, villages, and townships receiving a payment under section 952(2) and counties receiving a payment under section 955(2) shall receive 1/6 of their total payment on the last business day of October, December, February, April, June, and August. On the last business day of February 2026, cities, villages, and townships receiving a payment under section 952(3) and counties receiving a payment under section 955(3) shall receive 50% of the estimated payment to be received under section 952(3) or 955(3), as applicable. On the last business day of June 2026, cities, villages, and townships receiving a payment under section 952(3) and counties receiving a payment under 955(3) shall receive any remaining payment calculated under section 952(3) or 955(3), as applicable. (2) Payments distributed under section 952 or section 955 may be withheld in accordance with sections 17a and 21 of the Glenn 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Steil state revenue sharing act of 1971, 1971 PA 140, MCL 141.917a and 141.921. (3) If a city, village, or township that receives a payment under section 952 is determined to have a retirement pension benefit system in underfunded status under section 5 of the protecting local government retirement and benefits act, 2017 PA 202, MCL 38.2805, the city, village, or township must allocate to its pension unfunded liability an amount equal to 50% of the difference between its current year payment under section 952 and the amount the city, village or township would have been eligible to receive under section 952 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119, rounded to the nearest dollar, regardless of whether any limitation or eligibility criteria under section 952 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 was satisfied. A city, village, or township that has issued a municipal security under section 518 of the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2518, is exempt from this requirement. (4) If a county that receives a payment under section 955 is determined to have a retirement pension benefit system in underfunded status under section 5 of the protecting local government retirement and benefits act, 2017 PA 202, MCL 38.2805, the county must allocate to its pension unfunded liability an amount equal to 50% of the difference between its current year payment under section 955 and the amount the county would have been eligible to receive under section 955 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119, rounded to the nearest dollar, regardless of whether any limitation or eligibility criteria under section 955 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 was satisfied. A county that has issued a municipal security under section 518 of the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 MCL 141.2518, is exempt from this requirement. (5) If a city, village, township, or county does not report on plans to coordinate future transportation, electrical, telecommunication, water, and sewer improvements to the department by the first business day of December, the department shall withhold all remaining payments under section 952 or 955 until the local unit reports the required information under this subsection. (6) If the attorney general finds and reports to the department that a board, sheriff, or prosecutor declares a city, village, township, or county will not be in compliance with amendment V or XIV of the Constitution of the United States in regards to all residents of the community, or if the attorney general finds and reports to the department that a city, village, township, or county has systemically violated amendment V of the Constitution of the United States, the department shall withhold all payments under section 952 or 955 from that local unit for the remainder of the fiscal year. Sec. 955. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for county revenue sharing are for grants to counties and must be distributed as provided in this section. (2) From the first $261,069,700.00 appropriated in part 1, each county shall receive an amount equal to 100.0% of the revenue sharing payment for which the county would have been eligible to receive under section 955 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119, rounded to the nearest dollar, regardless of whether any limitation or eligibility criteria under sections 952 and 955 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 was satisfied. (3) From the remaining amount appropriated in part 1 for county revenue sharing after the distributions under subsection 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2), a taxable value payment must be made to each county, determined as follows: (a) Determine the per capita taxable value for each county by dividing the taxable value of that county by the population of that county. (b) Determine the statewide per capita taxable value by dividing the total taxable value of all counties by the total population of all counties. (c) Determine the per capita taxable value ratio for each county by dividing the statewide per capita taxable value by the per capita taxable value for that county. (d) Determine the adjusted taxable value population for each county by multiplying the per capita taxable value ratio as determined under subdivision (c) for that county by the population of that county. (e) Determine the total statewide adjusted taxable value population, which is the sum of all adjusted taxable value population for all counties. (f) Determine the taxable value payment rate by dividing the amount to be distributed under this subsection by the total statewide adjusted taxable value population as determined under subdivision (e). (g) Determine the taxable value payment for each county by multiplying the result under subdivision (f) by the adjusted taxable value population for that county. Sec. 956. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for financially distressed cities, villages, or townships, the department of treasury shall create and operate a grant program to award grants to cities, villages, and townships that have 1 or more 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 conditions that indicate probable financial distress, as determined by the department of treasury. A city, village, or township with 1 or more conditions that indicate probable financial distress may apply in a manner determined by the department of treasury for a grant to pay for specific projects or services that move the city, village, or township toward financial stability. Grants must be used for specific projects or services that move the city, village, or township toward financial stability. The city, village, or township must use the grants under this section to do 1 or more of the following: (a) Make payments to reduce unfunded accrued liability. (b) Repair or replace critical infrastructure and equipment owned or maintained by the city, village, or township. (c) Reduce debt obligations. (d) Pay for costs associated with a transition to shared services with another jurisdiction. (e) Administer other projects that move the city, village, or township toward financial stability. (2) The department of treasury shall award not more than $2,000,000.00 to any city, village, or township under this section. (3) Not later than March 31, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all of the following for each grant recipient. (a) The name of the grant recipient. (b) The date the grant was approved. (c) The amount of the grant. (d) A description of the project or projects that will be paid by the grant. (4) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 financially distressed cities, villages, or townships are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditure for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to provide assistance to financially distressed cities, villages, and townships under this section. (b) The projects will be accomplished by grants to cities, villages, and townships approved by the department of treasury. (c) The total estimated cost of all projects is $2,500,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. Sec. 957. A term that is defined in the Glenn Steil state revenue sharing act, 1971 PA 140, MCL 141.901 to 141.921, has the same meaning when used in sections 950 to 956. BUREAU OF STATE LOTTERY Sec. 960. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1 to the bureau of state lottery, there is appropriated from state lottery fund revenues the amount necessary for, and directly related to, implementing and operating lottery games under the McCauley-Traxler-Law-Bowman-McNeely lottery act, 1972 PA 239, MCL 432.1 to 432.47, and activities under the Traxler-McCauley-Law-Bowman bingo act, 1972 PA 382, MCL 432.101 to 432.152, including expenditures for contractually mandated payments for vendor commissions, contractually mandated payments for instant tickets intended for resale, the contractual costs of providing and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 maintaining the online system communications network, and incentive and bonus payments to lottery retailers. Sec. 964. For the bureau of state lottery, there is appropriated 1% of the lottery's immediately preceding fiscal year's gross sales for promotion and advertising. Michigan gaming control board Sec. 970. As used in sections 971 to 979: (a) "Compulsive gaming prevention fund" means the compulsive gaming prevention fund created in section 3 of the compulsive gaming prevention act, 1997 PA 70, MCL 432.253. (b) "Fantasy contest fund" means the fantasy contest fund created in section 16 of the fantasy contests consumer protection act, 2019 PA 157, MCL 432.516. (c) "First responder presumed coverage fund" means the first responder presumed coverage fund created in section 405 of the worker's disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL 418.405. (d) "Internet gaming fund" means the internet gaming fund created in section 16 of the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA 152, MCL 432.316. (e) "Internet sports betting fund" means the internet sports betting fund created in section 16 of the lawful sports betting act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.416. Sec. 971. (1) From the revenue collected by the Michigan gaming control board from the total annual assessment of each casino licensee, funds are appropriated and must be distributed as described in section 12a(5) of the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.212a. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2)? The revenue collected in the internet sports betting fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with the lawful sports betting act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.401 to 432.419. (3) The revenue collected in the internet gaming fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA 152, MCL 432.301 to 432.322, and the Traxler-McCauley-Law-Bowman bingo act, 1972 PA 382, MCL 432.101 to 432.152. Sec. 972. After all other required expenditures described in section 16(3) of the fantasy contests consumer protection act, 2019 PA 157, MCL 432.516, section 16(4) of the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA 152, MCL 432.316, and section 16(4) of the lawful sports betting act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.416 are made, any money remaining in the fantasy contest fund, internet gaming fund, and internet sports betting fund is appropriated and must be deposited in the state school aid fund as described in section 16(3)(b) of the fantasy contests consumer protection act, 2019 PA 157, MCL 432.516, section 16(4) of the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA 152, MCL 432.316, and section 16(4) of the lawful sports betting act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.416. Sec. 973. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for local government programs may be used to provide assistance to a local revenue sharing board referenced in an agreement authorized by the Indian gaming regulatory act, Public Law 100-497. (2) A local revenue sharing board described in subsection (1) shall comply with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275, and the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (3) A county treasurer may receive and administer funds on 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 behalf of a local revenue sharing board. Funds appropriated in part 1 for local government programs may be used to audit local revenue sharing board funds held by a county treasurer. This section does not limit the ability of local units of government to enter into agreements with federally recognized Indian tribes to provide financial assistance to local units of government or to jointly provide public services. (4) A local revenue sharing board described in subsection (1) shall comply with all applicable provisions of any agreement authorized by the Indian gaming regulatory act, Public Law 100-497, in which the local revenue sharing board is referenced, including, but not limited to, the disbursal of tribal casino payments received in accordance with applicable provisions of the tribal-state class III gaming compact under which those funds are received. (5) The director of the MDSP and the executive director of the Michigan gaming control board may assist the local revenue sharing boards in determining allocations to be made to local public safety organizations. (6) Not later than September 30, the Michigan gaming control board shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations on the receipts and distribution of revenues by local revenue sharing boards. Sec. 974. If revenues collected in the state services fee fund created in section 12a of the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.212a, are less than the amounts appropriated from the state services fee fund, available revenues must be used to fully fund the appropriation in part 1 for casino 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 gaming regulation activities before distributions are made to other state departments and agencies. If the remaining revenue in the state services fee fund is insufficient to fully fund appropriations to other state departments or agencies, the shortfall must be distributed proportionally among those departments and agencies. Sec. 975. In expending the funds appropriated in part 1 for advertising for responsible gaming, the Michigan gaming control board shall engage with MDHHS on strategies to support addiction prevention and education efforts in addition to advertising for responsible gaming. Not later than September 1, the Michigan gaming control board shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the expenditures and programming funded from the appropriations in part 1 for advertising for responsible gaming. Sec. 976. The executive director of the Michigan gaming control board may pay rewards of not more than $5,000.00 to a person who provides information that results in the arrest and conviction on a felony or misdemeanor charge for a crime that involves the horse racing industry. A reward paid under this section must be paid out of the appropriation in part 1 for the racing commission. Sec. 977. All appropriations from the equine industry development fund created in section 20 of the horse racing law of 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL 431.320, except for the racing commission appropriations, must be reduced proportionately if revenues to the equine industry development fund decline during the current fiscal year to a level lower than the amount appropriated in part 1. Sec. 978. The Michigan gaming control board shall use actual expenditure data in determining the actual regulatory costs of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 conducting racing dates and shall submit a report of that data to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives appropriations subcommittees on agriculture. The Michigan gaming control board may not be reimbursed for more than the actual regulatory cost of conducting race dates. In determining actual costs, the Michigan gaming control board shall take into account that each specific breed of horse may require different regulatory mechanisms. Sec. 979. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for millionaire party regulation, the Michigan gaming control board may receive and expend internet gaming fund revenue in an amount that is not more than the amount appropriated in part 1 for necessary expenses incurred in the licensing and regulation of millionaire parties under article 2 of the Traxler-McCauley-Law-Bowman bingo act, 1972 PA 382, MCL 432.132 to 432.152. Any unused internet gaming fund revenues are subject to the distribution requirements in section 16 of the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA 152, MCL 432.316. Not later than March 1, the Michigan gaming control board shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all of the following: (a) The total expenditures related to the licensing and regulating of millionaire parties. (b) The steps taken to ensure charities are receiving revenue due to them. (c) A description of the progress on promulgating rules to ensure compliance with the Traxler-McCauley-Law-Bowman bingo act, 1972 PA 382, MCL 432.101 to 432.152. (d) Any enforcement actions taken. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 990. The funds appropriated in part 1 for MI financial empowerment shall be used to develop and conduct a marketing campaign to promote financial literacy to Michigan residents. Eligible expenses include, but are not limited to, the purchase or creation of educational materials, paid advertising, planning and hosting events, and other activities to successfully execute the program. STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY Sec. 1100. (1) Subject to section 242 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1242, and on the approval of the state building authority, the department of treasury may expend from the general fund of this state during the fiscal year an amount necessary to meet the cash flow requirements of those state building authority projects solely for lease to a state agency identified in both part 1 and this section, and for which state building authority bonds or notes have not been issued, and for the sole acquisition by the state building authority of equipment and furnishings for lease to a state agency as permitted by 1964 PA 183, MCL 830.411 to 830.425, for which the issuance of bonds or notes is authorized by an appropriations PA that is effective for the immediately preceding fiscal year. Any general fund advances for which state building authority bonds have not been issued must bear an interest cost to the state building authority at a rate that is not greater than the rate earned by the state treasurer's common cash fund during the period in which the advances are outstanding and are repaid to the general fund of this state. (2) On sale of bonds or notes for the projects identified in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 part 1 or for equipment as authorized by an appropriations PA and in this section, the state building authority shall credit the general fund of this state an amount equal to the amount expended from the general fund plus interest, if any, as described in this section. (3) For state building authority projects for which bonds or notes have been issued and on the request of the state building authority, the state treasurer shall make advances without interest from the general fund as necessary to meet cash flow requirements for the projects. The state building authority shall reimburse the state treasurer for the advances when the investments earmarked for the financing of the projects mature. (4) If a project identified in part 1 is terminated after final design is complete, advances made on behalf of the state building authority for the costs of final design must be repaid to the general fund in a manner recommended by the director of the state building authority. Sec. 1102. (1) The state building authority shall not release state building authority funding to a university or community college to finance the construction or renovation of a facility that collects revenue in excess of money required for the operation of that facility unless the university or community college agrees to use that excess revenue to reimburse the state building authority. The excess revenue received by the state building authority as reimbursement must be credited to the general fund to offset rent obligations associated with the retirement of bonds issued for the applicable facility. The auditor general shall annually identify and audit the facilities that are subject to this section. Costs associated with the administration of the audit must 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 be charged against money received by the state building authority as reimbursement under this section. (2) As used in this section, "revenue" includes state appropriations, facility opening money, other state aid, indirect cost reimbursement, and other revenue generated by the activities of the facility. Sec. 1103. Not later than October 15, the state building authority shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the JCOS regarding the status of construction projects associated with state building authority bonds as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal year. Not later than 30 days after a refinancing or restructuring bond issue is sold, the state building authority shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the JCOS regarding the status of construction projects associated with that bond issue. Each report must include all of the following: (a) A list of all completed construction projects for which state building authority bonds have been sold, and which bonds are currently active. (b) A list of all projects under construction for which sale of state building authority bonds is pending. (c) A list of all projects authorized for construction or identified in an appropriations act for which approval of schematic/preliminary plans or total authorized cost is pending that have state building authority bonds identified as a source of financing. REVENUE STATEMENT Sec. 1201. Pursuant to section 18 of article V of the state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 constitution of 1963, fund balances and estimates are presented in the following statement: BUDGET RECOMMENDATIONS BY OPERATING FUNDS (Amounts in millions) Fiscal Year 2025-2026 Beginning Balance Estimated Revenue Ending Balance OPERATING FUNDS General fund/general purpose 721.6 14,650.4 11.7 School aid fund 1,002.6 18,891.4 18.6 Federal aid 0.0 28,767.0 0.0 Transportation funds 0.0 8,583.1 0.0 Special revenue funds 2,788.3 8,824.6 2,103.8 Other funds 2,144.7 129.0 2,273.7 TOTALS $6,657.2 $79,845.5 $4,407.8